Nebraska, session 109, LB650.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Sections 1 to 8 of this act shall be known and may be cited as
the Community Development Assistance Act.
Sec. 2. The Legislature hereby finds that areas of chronic economic
distress in the State of Nebraska are a detriment to the economic well-being,
health, and safety of the citizens of Nebraska. The Legislature further
contends that current governmental solutions have not been able to completely
resolve certain problems such as overcrowding, unemployment, and poor health
and sanitary conditions in a community which lead to further deterioration.
Such problems cannot be remedied by the government alone, but can be alleviated
through a partnership between the government and private enterprise. It is
therefore declared to be public policy in this state to encourage contributions
by business firms and individuals that offer and provide community and
neighborhood assistance and community services.
Sec. 3. For purposes of the Community Development Assistance Act, unless
the context otherwise requires:
(1) Area of chronic economic distress means an area of the state which
meets any of the following conditions:
(a) An unemployment rate which exceeds the statewide average unemployment
rate;
(b) A per capita income below the statewide average per capita income; or
(c) A population loss between the two most recent federal decennial
censuses;
(2) Business firm means any business entity, including a corporation, a
fiduciary, a sole proprietorship, a partnership, a limited liability company, a
corporation having an election in effect under Chapter 1, subchapter S, of the
Internal Revenue Code, subject to the state income tax imposed by section
77-2715 or 77-2734.02, an insurance company paying premium or related
retaliatory taxes in this state pursuant to section 44-150 or 77-908, or a
financial institution paying the tax imposed pursuant to sections 77-3801 to
77-3807;
(3) Community assistance means furnishing financial assistance, labor,
material, or technical advice to aid in the physical improvement of any part or
all of a community development area;
(4) Community betterment organization means (a) any organization
performing community services or offering community assistance in a community
development area and to which contributions are tax deductible under the
provisions of the Internal Revenue Service of the United States Department of
the Treasury and (b) a county, city, or village performing community services
or offering community assistance in a community development area;
(5) Community development area means any village, city, county,
unincorporated area of a county, or census tract which has been designated by
the department as an area of chronic economic distress;
-1-

LB650 LB650
2025 2025
(6) Community services means any type of the following in a community
development area: (a) Employment training; (b) human services; (c) medical
services; (d) physical facility and neighborhood development services; (e)
recreational services or activities; (f) educational services; or (g) crime
prevention activities, including, but not limited to, (i) the instruction of
any individual in the community development area that enables him or her to
acquire vocational skills, (ii) counseling and advice, (iii) emergency
services, (iv) community, youth, day care, and senior citizen centers, (v) in-
home services, (vi) home improvement services and programs, and (vii) any legal
enterprise which aids in the prevention or reduction of crime;
(7) Department means the Department of Economic Development; and
(8) Director means the Director of Economic Development.
Sec. 4. Any community betterment organization which provides community
assistance or community services in a community development area may apply any
time during the fiscal year to the department to have one or more programs
certified for tax credit status as provided in sections 5 to 8 of this act. The
proposal shall set forth the program to be conducted, the community development
area, the estimated amount to be required for completion of the program or the
annual estimated amount required for an ongoing program, the plans for
implementing the program, and the amount of contributions committed or
anticipated for such activities or services.
Sec. 5. If the subdivision of local government has adopted a community
development plan for an area which includes the area in which the community
betterment organization is providing community assistance or community
services, the organization shall submit a copy of the program proposal to the
chief executive officer of such subdivision. If the program proposal is
consistent with the adopted community development plan, the chief executive
officer shall so certify to the department for the department's approval or
disapproval. If the program proposal is not consistent with the adopted
community development plan of the local subdivision, the chief executive
officer shall so indicate and the proposal shall not be approved by the
department. If the proposed activities are consistent with the adopted
community development plan, but for other reasons they are not viewed as
appropriate by the local subdivision, the chief executive officer shall so
indicate and the department shall review the program proposal and approve or
disapprove it. The local subdivision shall review the proposal within forty-
five days from the date of receipt for review. If the subdivision does not
issue its finding concerning the proposal within forty-five days after receipt,
the proposal shall be deemed approved. The department shall approve or
disapprove a program proposal submitted pursuant to section 4 of this act
within forty-five days of receipt by the department.
Sec. 6. (1) The director shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations
for the approval or disapproval of the program proposals submitted pursuant to
section 5 of this act taking into account the economic need level and the
geographic distribution of the population of the community development area.
The director shall also adopt and promulgate rules and regulations concerning
the amount of the tax credit for which a program shall be certified. The tax
credits shall be available for contributions to a certified program which may
qualify as a charitable contribution deduction on the federal income tax return
filed by the business firm or individual making such contribution. The decision
of the department to approve or disapprove all or any portion of a proposal
shall be in writing. If the proposal is approved, the maximum tax credit
allowance for the certified program shall be stated along with the approval.
The maximum tax credit allowance approved by the department shall be final for
the fiscal year in which the program is certified. A copy of all decisions
shall be transmitted to the Tax Commissioner. A copy of all credits allowed to
business firms under sections 44-150 and 77-908 shall be transmitted to the
Director of Insurance.
(2) For all business firms and individuals eligible for the credit allowed
by section 7 of this act, except for insurance companies paying premium and
related retaliatory taxes in this state pursuant to section 44-150 or 77-908,
the Tax Commissioner shall provide for the manner in which the credit allowed
by section 7 of this act shall be taken and the forms on which such credit
shall be allowed. The Tax Commissioner shall adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations for the method of providing tax credits. The Director of Insurance
shall provide for the manner in which the credit allowed by section 7 of this
act to insurance companies paying premium and related retaliatory taxes in this
state pursuant to sections 44-150 and 77-908 shall be taken and the forms on
which such credit shall be allowed. The Director of Insurance may adopt and
promulgate rules and regulations for the method of providing the tax credit.
The Tax Commissioner shall allow against any income tax due from the insurance
companies paying premium and related retaliatory taxes in this state pursuant
to section 44-150 or 77-908 a credit for the credit provided by section 7 of
this act and allowed by the Director of Insurance.
Sec. 7. (1) Any business firm or individual which plans to or which has
contributed to a certified program of a community betterment organization may
apply to the department for authorization for a tax credit for the contribution
to the certified program in an amount up to but not exceeding the maximum tax
credit allowed by the department. The maximum tax credit allowed by the
department for each approved business firm or individual shall be in an amount
which does not exceed forty percent of the total amount contributed by the
business firm or individual during its taxable year to any programs certified
pursuant to section 5 of this act. The director shall send a copy of the
-2-

LB650 LB650
2025 2025
approved application which includes the amount of the tax credit to be allowed
and a certification by the department that the contribution has been paid as
proposed by the business firm or individual to the Tax Commissioner who shall
grant a tax credit against any tax due under sections 77-2715, 77-2734.02, and
77-3801 to 77-3807 and to the Director of Insurance who shall grant a tax
credit against any premium and related retaliatory taxes due under sections
44-150 and 77-908.
(2) No tax credit shall be granted to any business firm or individual in
this state pursuant to the Community Development Assistance Act for activities
that are a part of its normal course of business. Any tax credit balance may be
carried over and applied against the business firm's or individual's tax
liability for the next five years immediately succeeding the tax year in which
the credit was first allowed.
Sec. 8. The total amount of tax credit granted for programs approved and
certified under the Community Development Assistance Act by the department for
any fiscal year shall not exceed three hundred fifty thousand dollars.
Sec. 9. Section 18-3417, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
18-3417 (1)(a) At any sale of real property for the nonpayment of taxes
conducted pursuant to sections 77-1801 to 77-1863, a land bank may:
(i) Bid on such real property in an amount equal to the total amount of
taxes, interest, and costs due on the real property. If a bid is given pursuant
to this subdivision, the bid shall not receive any special treatment by the
county treasurer and shall be accepted or rejected in the same manner as any
other bid on such real property; or
(ii) If a land bank is created by a city of the metropolitan class that
borders a county in which at least three cities of the first class are located
and if approved by a two-thirds vote of the board, give an automatically
accepted bid on such real property in an amount equal to the total amount of
taxes, interest, and costs due on the real property. If an automatically
accepted bid is given, it shall be accepted by the county treasurer regardless
of any other bids on such real property. An automatically accepted bid may be
given only if the conditions for making such a bid prescribed by the board
pursuant to subsection (11) of section 18-3405 have been met.
(b) If a land bank's bid pursuant to subdivision (1)(a) of this section is
accepted by the county treasurer, the land bank shall pay the county treasurer
and shall be entitled to a tax sale certificate for such real property.
(2) If a county holds a tax sale certificate pursuant to section 77-1809,
a land bank may purchase such tax sale certificate from the county by paying
the county treasurer the amount expressed on the face of the certificate and
interest thereon at the rate specified in section 45-104.01, as such rate may
from time to time be adjusted by the Legislature, from the date the tax sale
certificate was first issued to the county to the date such certificate was
purchased by the land bank.
(3)(a) Subdivision (b) of this subsection applies until January 1, 2015.
Subdivision (c) of this subsection applies beginning January 1, 2015.
(b) Within six months after the expiration of three years from the date of
sale of real property for the nonpayment of taxes pursuant to sections 77-1801
to 77-1863, a land bank that has acquired a tax sale certificate for such real
property under this section may:
(i) Apply to the county treasurer for a tax deed for the real property
described in the tax sale certificate. A land bank applying for a tax deed
shall comply with all the requirements of sections 77-1801 to 77-1863 relating
to such tax deed; or
(ii) Foreclose the lien represented by the tax sale certificate as
authorized in section 77-1902.
(3) A (c) Within nine months after the expiration of three years from the
date of sale of real property for the nonpayment of taxes pursuant to sections
77-1801 to 77-1863, a land bank that has acquired a tax sale certificate for
such real property under this section may:
(a) (i) Apply to the county treasurer for a tax deed for the real property
described in the tax sale certificate. The land bank shall apply for such tax
deed within the time period prescribed in subdivision (1)(a) or (b) of section
77-1837, whichever is applicable, and A land bank applying for a tax deed shall
comply with all the requirements of sections 77-1801 to 77-1863 relating to
such tax deed; or
(b) (ii) Foreclose the lien represented by the tax sale certificate as
authorized in section 77-1902. The land bank shall foreclose such lien within
the time period prescribed in subdivision (2)(a) or (b) of section 77-1902,
whichever is applicable.
Sec. 10. Section 60-3,185, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
60-3,185 A motor vehicle tax is imposed on motor vehicles registered for
operation upon the highways of this state, except:
(1) Motor vehicles exempt from the registration fee in section 60-3,160;
(2) One motor vehicle owned and used for his or her personal
transportation by a disabled veteran or blind veteran of the United States
Armed Forces as defined in section 77-202.23 whose disability or blindness is
recognized by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs and who was
discharged or otherwise separated with a characterization of honorable if an
application for the exemption has been approved under subsection (1) of section
60-3,189;
(3) Motor vehicles owned by Indians who are members of an Indian tribe;
-3-

LB650 LB650
2025 2025
(4) Motor vehicles owned by a member of the United States Armed Forces
serving in this state in compliance with military or naval orders or his or her
spouse if such servicemember or spouse is a resident of a state other than
Nebraska;
(5) Motor vehicles owned by the state and its governmental subdivisions
and exempt as provided in subdivision (1)(a) or (b) of section 77-202;
(6) Motor vehicles owned and used exclusively by an organization or
society qualified for a tax exemption provided in subdivision (1)(c) or (d) of
section 77-202 if an application for the exemption provided in this subdivision
has been approved under subsection (2) of section 60-3,189; and
(7) Trucks, trailers, or combinations thereof registered under section
60-3,198.
Sec. 11. Section 77-202.23, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
77-202.23 As used in sections 77-202.23 and 77-202.24, unless the context
otherwise requires:
(1) Disabled veteran has the same meaning as in 5 U.S.C. 2108, as such
section existed on January 1, 2025 person shall mean a veteran who has lost the
use of or has undergone amputation of two or more extremities or has undergone
amputation of one or more extremities and has lost the use of one or more
extremities; and
(2) Blind veteran means shall mean a veteran whose sight is so defective
as to seriously limit such veteran's his ability to engage in the ordinary
vocations and activities of life.
Sec. 12. Section 77-202.24, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
77-202.24 A mobile home shall be exempt from taxation if it is owned and
occupied by a disabled veteran or blind veteran of the United States Armed
Forces whose disability or blindness is recognized by the United States
Department of Veterans Affairs as service connected and who was discharged or
otherwise separated with a characterization of honorable or general (under
honorable conditions).
Sec. 13. Section 77-908, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
77-908 Every insurance company organized under the stock, mutual,
assessment, or reciprocal plan, except fraternal benefit societies, which is
transacting business in this state shall, on or before March 1 of each year,
pay a tax to the director of one percent of the gross amount of direct writing
premiums received by it during the preceding calendar year for business done in
this state, except that (1) for group sickness and accident insurance the rate
of such tax shall be five-tenths of one percent and (2) for property and
casualty insurance, excluding individual sickness and accident insurance, the
rate of such tax shall be one percent. A captive insurer authorized under the
Captive Insurers Act that is transacting business in this state shall, on or
before March 1 of each year, pay to the director a tax of one-fourth of one
percent of the gross amount of direct writing premiums received by such insurer
during the preceding calendar year for business transacted in the state. The
taxable premiums shall include premiums paid on the lives of persons residing
in this state and premiums paid for risks located in this state whether the
insurance was written in this state or not, including that portion of a group
premium paid which represents the premium for insurance on Nebraska residents
or risks located in Nebraska included within the group when the number of lives
in the group exceeds five hundred. The tax shall also apply to premiums
received by domestic companies for insurance written on individuals residing
outside this state or risks located outside this state if no comparable tax is
paid by the direct writing domestic company to any other appropriate taxing
authority. Companies whose scheme of operation contemplates the return of a
portion of premiums to policyholders, without such policyholders being
claimants under the terms of their policies, may deduct such return premiums or
dividends from their gross premiums for the purpose of tax calculations. Any
such insurance company shall receive a credit on the tax imposed as provided in
the Community Development Assistance Act, the Creating High Impact Economic
Futures Act, the Nebraska Job Creation and Mainstreet Revitalization Act, the
New Markets Job Growth Investment Act, the Nebraska Higher Blend Tax Credit
Act, the Relocation Incentive Act, the Sustainable Aviation Fuel Tax Credit
Act, the Nebraska Shortline Rail Modernization Act, and the Affordable Housing
Tax Credit Act.
Sec. 14. Section 77-1632, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
77-1632 (1) If the annual assessment of property would result in an
increase in the total property taxes levied by a county, city, village, school
district, learning community, sanitary and improvement district, natural
resources district, educational service unit, or community college, as
determined using the previous year's rate of levy, such political subdivision's
property tax request for the current year shall be no more than its property
tax request in the prior year, and the political subdivision's rate of levy for
the current year shall be decreased accordingly when such rate is set by the
county board of equalization pursuant to section 77-1601. The governing body of
the political subdivision shall pass a resolution or ordinance to set the
amount of its property tax request after holding the public hearing required in
subsection (3) of this section. If the governing body of a political
subdivision seeks to set its property tax request at an amount that exceeds its
property tax request in the prior year, it may do so, subject to the
-4-

LB650 LB650
2025 2025
limitations provided in the School District Property Tax Limitation Act and the
Property Tax Growth Limitation Act, after holding the public hearing required
in subsection (3) of this section and by passing a resolution or ordinance that
complies with subsection (4) of this section. If any county, city, or school
district , or community college seeks to increase its property tax request by
more than the allowable growth percentage, such political subdivision shall
comply with the requirements of section 77-1633 in lieu of the requirements in
subsections (3) and (4) of this section.
(2) If the annual assessment of property would result in no change or a
decrease in the total property taxes levied by a county, city, village, school
district, learning community, sanitary and improvement district, natural
resources district, educational service unit, or community college, as
determined using the previous year's rate of levy, such political subdivision's
property tax request for the current year shall be no more than its property
tax request in the prior year, and the political subdivision's rate of levy for
the current year shall be adjusted accordingly when such rate is set by the
county board of equalization pursuant to section 77-1601. The governing body of
the political subdivision shall pass a resolution or ordinance to set the
amount of its property tax request after holding the public hearing required in
subsection (3) of this section. If the governing body of a political
subdivision seeks to set its property tax request at an amount that exceeds its
property tax request in the prior year, it may do so, subject to the
limitations provided in the School District Property Tax Limitation Act and the
Property Tax Growth Limitation Act, after holding the public hearing required
in subsection (3) of this section and by passing a resolution or ordinance that
complies with subsection (4) of this section. If any county, city, or school
district , or community college seeks to increase its property tax request by
more than the allowable growth percentage, such political subdivision shall
comply with the requirements of section 77-1633 in lieu of the requirements in
subsections (3) and (4) of this section.
(3) The resolution or ordinance required under this section shall only be
passed after a special public hearing called for such purpose is held and after
notice is published in a newspaper of general circulation in the area of the
political subdivision at least four calendar days prior to the hearing. For
purposes of such notice, the four calendar days shall include the day of
publication but not the day of hearing. If the political subdivision's total
operating budget, not including reserves, does not exceed ten thousand dollars
per year or twenty thousand dollars per biennial period, the notice may be
posted at the governing body's principal headquarters. The hearing notice shall
contain the following information: The certified taxable valuation under
section 13-509 for the prior year, the certified taxable valuation under
section 13-509 for the current year, and the percentage increase or decrease in
such valuations from the prior year to the current year; the dollar amount of
the prior year's tax request and the property tax rate that was necessary to
fund that tax request; the property tax rate that would be necessary to fund
last year's tax request if applied to the current year's valuation; the
proposed dollar amount of the tax request for the current year and the property
tax rate that will be necessary to fund that tax request; the percentage
increase or decrease in the property tax rate from the prior year to the
current year; and the percentage increase or decrease in the total operating
budget from the prior year to the current year.
(4) Any resolution or ordinance setting a political subdivision's property
tax request under this section at an amount that exceeds the political
subdivision's property tax request in the prior year shall include, but not be
limited to, the following information:
(a) The name of the political subdivision;
(b) The amount of the property tax request;
(c) The following statements:
(i) The total assessed value of property differs from last year's total
assessed value by ..... percent;
(ii) The tax rate which would levy the same amount of property taxes as
last year, when multiplied by the new total assessed value of property, would
be $..... per $100 of assessed value;
(iii) The (name of political subdivision) proposes to adopt a property tax
request that will cause its tax rate to be $..... per $100 of assessed value;
and
(iv) Based on the proposed property tax request and changes in other
revenue, the total operating budget of (name of political subdivision) will
(increase or decrease) last year's budget by ..... percent; and
(d) The record vote of the governing body in passing such resolution or
ordinance.
(5) Any resolution or ordinance setting a property tax request under this
section shall be certified and forwarded to the county clerk on or before
October 15 of the year for which the tax request is to apply.
Sec. 15. Section 77-1633, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
77-1633 (1) For purposes of this section, political subdivision means any
county, city, or school district , or community college.
(2) If any political subdivision seeks to increase its property tax
request by more than the allowable growth percentage, such political
subdivision may do so, subject to the limitations provided in the School
District Property Tax Limitation Act and the Property Tax Growth Limitation
Act, if the following requirements are met:
-5-

LB650 LB650
2025 2025
(a) A public hearing is held and notice of such hearing is provided in
compliance with subsection (3) of this section; and
(b) The governing body of such political subdivision passes a resolution
or an ordinance that complies with subsection (4) of this section.
(3)(a) Each political subdivision within a county that seeks to increase
its property tax request by more than the allowable growth percentage shall
participate in a joint public hearing. Each such political subdivision shall
designate one representative to attend the joint public hearing on behalf of
the political subdivision. If a political subdivision includes area in more
than one county, the political subdivision shall be deemed to be within the
county in which the political subdivision's principal headquarters are located.
At such hearing, there shall be no items on the agenda other than discussion on
each political subdivision's intent to increase its property tax request by
more than the allowable growth percentage.
(b) At least one elected official from each participating political
subdivision shall attend the joint public hearing. An elected official may be
the designated representative from a participating political subdivision. The
presence of a quorum or the participation of elected officials at the joint
public hearing does not constitute a meeting as defined by section 84-1409 of
the Open Meetings Act.
(c) The joint public hearing shall be held on or after September 14 and
prior to September 24 and before any of the participating political
subdivisions file their adopted budget statement pursuant to section 13-508.
(d) The joint public hearing shall be held after 6 p.m. local time on the
relevant date.
(e) The joint public hearing shall be organized by the county clerk or his
or her designee. At the joint public hearing, the designated representative of
each political subdivision shall give a brief presentation on the political
subdivision's intent to increase its property tax request by more than the
allowable growth percentage and the effect of such request on the political
subdivision's budget. The presentation shall include:
(i) The name of the political subdivision;
(ii) The amount of the property tax request; and
(iii) The following statements:
(A) The total assessed value of property differs from last year's total
assessed value by ..... percent;
(B) The tax rate which would levy the same amount of property taxes as
last year, when multiplied by the new total assessed value of property, would
be $..... per $100 of assessed value;
(C) The (name of political subdivision) proposes to adopt a property tax
request that will cause its tax rate to be $..... per $100 of assessed value;
(D) Based on the proposed property tax request and changes in other
revenue, the total operating budget of (name of political subdivision) will
exceed last year's by ..... percent; and
(E) To obtain more information regarding the increase in the property tax
request, citizens may contact the (name of political subdivision) at (telephone
number and email address of political subdivision).
(f) Any member of the public shall be allowed to speak at the joint public
hearing and shall be given a reasonable amount of time to do so.
(g) Notice of the joint public hearing shall be provided:
(i) By sending a postcard to all affected property taxpayers. The postcard
shall be sent to the name and address to which the property tax statement is
mailed;
(ii) By posting notice of the hearing on the home page of the relevant
county's website, except that this requirement shall only apply if the county
has a population of more than ten thousand inhabitants; and
(iii) By publishing notice of the hearing in a legal newspaper in or of
general circulation in the relevant county.
(h) Each political subdivision that participates in the joint public
hearing shall electronically send the information prescribed in subdivision (3)
(i) of this section to the county assessor by September 4. The county clerk
shall notify the county assessor of the date, time, and location of the joint
public hearing no later than September 4. The county clerk shall notify each
participating political subdivision of the date, time, and location of the
joint public hearing. The county assessor shall send the information required
to be included on the postcards pursuant to subdivision (3)(i) of this section
to a printing service designated by the county board. The initial cost for
printing the postcards shall be paid from the county general fund. Such
postcards shall be mailed at least seven calendar days before the joint public
hearing. The cost of creating and mailing the postcards, including staff time,
materials, and postage, shall be charged proportionately to the political
subdivisions participating in the joint public hearing based on the total
number of parcels in each participating political subdivision. Each
participating political subdivision shall also maintain a prominently displayed
and easily accessible link on the home page of the political subdivision's
website to the political subdivision's proposed budget, except that this
requirement shall not apply if the political subdivision is a county with a
population of less than ten thousand inhabitants, a city with a population of
less than one thousand inhabitants, or, for joint public hearings prior to
January 1, 2024, a school district.
(i) The postcard sent under this subsection and the notice posted on the
county's website, if required under subdivision (3)(g)(ii) of this section, and
published in the newspaper shall include the date, time, and location for the
-6-

LB650 LB650
2025 2025
joint public hearing, a listing of and telephone number for each political
subdivision that will be participating in the joint public hearing, and the
amount of each participating political subdivision's property tax request. The
postcard shall also contain the following information:
(i) The following words in capitalized type at the top of the postcard:
NOTICE OF PROPOSED TAX INCREASE;
(ii) The name of the county that will hold the joint public hearing, which
shall appear directly underneath the capitalized words described in subdivision
(3)(i)(i) of this section;
(iii) The following statement: The following political subdivisions are
proposing a revenue increase which would result in an overall increase in
property taxes in (insert current tax year). THE ACTUAL TAX ON YOUR PROPERTY
MAY INCREASE OR DECREASE. This notice contains estimates of the tax on your
property as a result of this revenue increase. These estimates are calculated
on the basis of the proposed (insert current tax year) data. The actual tax on
your property may vary from these estimates.
(iv) The parcel number for the property;
(v) The name of the property owner and the address of the property;
(vi) The property's assessed value in the previous tax year;
(vii) The amount of property taxes due in the previous tax year for each
participating political subdivision;
(viii) The property's assessed value for the current tax year;
(ix) The amount of property taxes due for the current tax year for each
participating political subdivision;
(x) The change in the amount of property taxes due for each participating
political subdivision from the previous tax year to the current tax year; and
(xi) The following statement: To obtain more information regarding the tax
increase, citizens may contact the political subdivision at the telephone
number provided in this notice.
(4) After the joint public hearing required in subsection (3) of this
section, the governing body of each participating political subdivision shall
pass an ordinance or resolution to set such political subdivision's property
tax request. If the political subdivision is increasing its property tax
request over the amount from the prior year, including any increase in excess
of the allowable growth percentage, then such ordinance or resolution shall
include, but not be limited to, the following information:
(a) The name of the political subdivision;
(b) The amount of the property tax request;
(c) The following statements:
(i) The total assessed value of property differs from last year's total
assessed value by ..... percent;
(ii) The tax rate which would levy the same amount of property taxes as
last year, when multiplied by the new total assessed value of property, would
be $..... per $100 of assessed value;
(iii) The (name of political subdivision) proposes to adopt a property tax
request that will cause its tax rate to be $..... per $100 of assessed value;
and
(iv) Based on the proposed property tax request and changes in other
revenue, the total operating budget of (name of political subdivision) will
exceed last year's by ..... percent; and
(d) The record vote of the governing body in passing such resolution or
ordinance.
(5) Any resolution or ordinance setting a property tax request under this
section shall be certified and forwarded to the county clerk on or before
October 15 of the year for which the tax request is to apply.
(6) The county clerk, or his or her designee, shall prepare a report which
shall include:
(a) The names of the designated representatives of the political
subdivisions participating in the joint public hearing;
(b) The name and address of each individual who spoke at the joint public
hearing, unless the address requirement is waived to protect the security of
the individual, and the name of any organization represented by each such
individual;
(c) The name of each political subdivision that participated in the joint
public hearing;
(d) The real growth value and real growth percentage for each
participating political subdivision;
(e) The amount each participating political subdivision seeks to increase
its property tax request in excess of the allowable growth percentage; and
(f) The number of individuals who signed in to attend the joint public
hearing.
Such report shall be delivered to the political subdivisions participating
in the joint public hearing within ten days after such hearing.
Sec. 16. Section 77-1802, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
77-1802 The county treasurer shall, not less than four nor more than six
weeks prior to the first Monday of March in each year, make out a list of all
real property subject to sale and the amount of all delinquent taxes against
each item with an accompanying notice stating that so much of such property
described in the list as may be necessary for that purpose will, on the first
Monday of March next thereafter, be sold by such county treasurer at public
auction at his or her office or other designated location for the taxes,
interest, and costs thereon. In making such list, the county treasurer shall
-7-

LB650 LB650
2025 2025
describe the property as it is described on the tax list and shall include the
name of the owner of record of the property as shown on the most current
certified tax roll, the property's parcel number, if any, and the property's
street address, if any.
Sec. 17. Section 77-1804, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
77-1804 (1) The county treasurer shall cause the list of real property
subject to sale and accompanying notice to be published once a week for three
consecutive weeks prior to the date of sale, commencing the first week in
February, in a legal newspaper and, in counties having more than two hundred
fifty thousand inhabitants, in a daily legal newspaper of general circulation,
published in the English language in the county, and designated by the county
board. The county treasurer shall also cause to be posted in some conspicuous
place in his or her office a copy of such notice. The treasurer shall assess
against each description the sum of twenty five dollars to defray the expenses
of advertising, which sum shall be added to the total amount due on such real
property and be collected in the same manner as taxes are collected.
(2) The county treasurer shall also forward an electronic copy of the list
of real property subject to sale to the Property Tax Administrator who shall
compile a list for all counties and publish the compiled list on the website of
the Department of Revenue.
(3) It is the intent of the Legislature to examine the twenty-dollar fee
provided in subsection (1) of this section at least once every five years
beginning in 2030 in order to determine whether such fee should be adjusted.
Sec. 18. Section 77-1806, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
77-1806 On the day designated in the notice of sale, the county treasurer
or his or her designee shall commence the sale of the real property on which
the taxes and charges have not been paid and shall continue the sale from day
to day, Sundays and holidays excepted, until each item of real property or so
much thereof as is sufficient to pay the taxes and charges thereon, including
the cost of advertising, has been sold or offered for sale.
Sec. 19. Section 77-1807, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
77-1807 (1)(a) This subsection applies until January 1, 2015.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (c) of this subsection,
the person who offers to pay the amount of taxes due on any real property for
the smallest portion of the same shall be the purchaser, and when such person
designates the smallest portion of the real property for which he or she will
pay the amount of taxes assessed against any such property, the portion thus
designated shall be considered an undivided portion.
(c) If a land bank gives an automatically accepted bid for the real
property pursuant to section 18-3417, the land bank shall be the purchaser,
regardless of the bid of any other person.
(d) If no person bids for a less quantity than the whole and no land bank
has given an automatically accepted bid pursuant to section 18-3417, the
treasurer may sell any real property to any one who will take the whole and pay
the taxes and charges thereon.
(e) If the homestead is listed separately as a homestead, it shall be sold
only for the taxes delinquent thereon.
(2)(a) This subsection applies beginning January 1, 2015.
(b) If a land bank gives an automatically accepted bid for real property
pursuant to section 18-3417, the land bank shall be the purchaser and no public
or private auction shall be held under sections 77-1801 to 77-1863.
(c) If no land bank has given an automatically accepted bid pursuant to
section 18-3417, the person who offers to pay the amount of taxes, delinquent
interest, and costs due on any real property shall be the purchaser.
(d) The county treasurer or his or her designee shall announce bidding
rules at the beginning of the public auction, and such rules shall apply to all
bidders throughout the public auction.
(e) The sale, if conducted in a round-robin format, shall be conducted in
the following manner:
(i) At the commencement of the sale, a count shall be taken of the number
of registered bidders present who want to be eligible to purchase property.
Each registered bidder shall only be counted once. If additional registered
bidders appear at the sale after the commencement of a round, such registered
bidders shall have the opportunity to participate at the end of the next
following round, if any, as provided in subdivision (v) of this subdivision;
(ii) Sequentially enumerated tickets shall be placed in a receptacle. The
number of tickets in the receptacle for the first round shall equal the count
taken in subdivision (i) of this subdivision, and the number of tickets in the
receptacle for each subsequent round shall equal the number of the count taken
in subdivision (i) of this subdivision plus additional registered bidders as
provided in subdivision (v) of this subdivision;
(iii) In a manner determined by the county treasurer or his or her
designee, tickets shall be selected from the receptacle by hand for each
registered bidder whereby each ticket has an equal chance of being selected.
Tickets shall be selected until there are no tickets remaining in the
receptacle;
(iv) The number on the ticket selected for a registered bidder shall
represent the order in which a registered bidder may purchase property
consisting of one parcel subject to sale from the list per round; and
(v) If property listed remains unsold at the end of a round, a new round
-8-

LB650 LB650
2025 2025
shall commence until all property listed is either sold or, if any property
listed remains unsold, each registered bidder has consecutively passed on the
opportunity to make a purchase. Registered bidders who are not present when it
is their turn to purchase property shall be considered to have passed on the
opportunity to make a purchase. At the beginning of the second and any
subsequent rounds, the county treasurer or his or her designee shall inquire
whether there are additional registered bidders. If additional registered
bidders are present, tickets for each such bidder shall be placed in a
receptacle and selected as provided in subdivisions (ii) through (iv) of this
subdivision. The second and any subsequent rounds shall proceed in the same
manner and purchase order as the last preceding round, except that any
additional registered bidders shall be given the opportunity to purchase at the
end of the round in the order designated on their ticket.
(f) Any property remaining unsold upon completion of the public auction
shall be sold at a private sale pursuant to section 77-1814.
(g) A bidder shall (i) register with the county treasurer or his or her
designee prior to participating in the sale, (ii) provide proof that it
maintains a registered agent for service of process with the Secretary of State
if the bidder is a foreign corporation, and (iii) pay a twenty-five-dollar
registration fee. The fee is not refundable upon redemption.
Sec. 20. Section 77-1815, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
77-1815 If any treasurer fails to attend any sale of real property as
required by sections 77-1801 to 77-1814, either in person or by designee
deputy, he or she shall be liable to a fine of not less than fifty nor more
than three hundred dollars to be recovered by an action in the district court
in the name of the county against the treasurer and the person issuing the
treasurer's bond.
Sec. 21. Section 77-1816, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
77-1816 If any treasurer or designee deputy shall sell or assist in
selling any real property, knowing the same to be not subject to taxation, or
that the taxes for which the same is sold have been paid, or shall knowingly
and willfully sell, or assist in selling, any real property for the payment of
taxes to defraud the owner of such real property, or shall knowingly execute a
deed for property so sold, he shall be deemed guilty of a Class I misdemeanor
and shall be liable to pay the injured party all damages sustained by such
wrongful act, and all such sales shall be void.
Sec. 22. Section 77-1818, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
77-1818 (1) The purchaser of any real property sold by the county
treasurer or his or her designee for taxes shall be entitled to a certificate
in writing, describing the real property so purchased, the sum paid, the date
when the purchaser will be entitled to a deed for real property determined to
be vacant and abandoned pursuant to section 77-1837, and the date time when the
purchaser will be entitled to a deed for any other real property, which
certificate shall be signed by the county treasurer in his or her official
capacity and shall be presumptive evidence of the regularity of all prior
proceedings. The certificate may be provided to the purchaser by hand delivery,
mail, or electronic means. Each tax lien shall be shown on a single
certificate. The purchaser acquires a perpetual lien of the tax on the real
property, and if after the taxes become delinquent he or she subsequently pays
any taxes levied on the property, whether levied for any year or years previous
or subsequent to such sale, he or she shall have the same lien for them and may
add them to the amount paid by him or her in the purchase.
(2) Upon issuance of the certificate, the purchaser shall notify, by
personal or residence service, and if unsuccessful, by certified mail service,
the property owner of the real property that was sold for taxes at the address
listed for such owner in the records of the county assessor. The notice shall
(a) state that a certificate has been issued, (b) include a brief description
of the property owner's legal rights to redeem the real property, (c) identify
the real property by the street address listed in the records of the county
assessor, (d) include the total amount of taxes, interest, and costs for which
the property was sold and a recitation that interest and fees may accrue, and
(e) include the purchaser's name, and (f) include a prominent warning that
failure to act may result in forfeiture of the property. Upon the issuance of
the certificate, an administrative fee of one hundred fifty dollars shall be
charged to the property owner. The after three years. The purchaser shall prove
such service of notice by affidavit, and such affidavit shall be filed with the
application for the tax deed pursuant to section 77-1837. An administrative fee
shall be allowed for any service of notice under this subsection. The
administrative fee shall be equal to the greater of one hundred dollars or the
actual cost incurred by the purchaser for such service of notice. The amount of
such fee shall be noted by the county treasurer in the record opposite the real
property described in the notice and shall be collected by the county treasurer
in case of redemption for the benefit of the holder of the certificate. The
purchaser shall notify the county treasurer of the amount of such fee within
thirty days after completion of the service of notice.
(3) Personal or residence service under subsection (2) of this section is
not required on certificates purchased by or issued to counties pursuant to
sections 77-1809 and 77-1918.
Sec. 23. Section 77-1819, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
-9-

LB650 LB650
2025 2025
77-1819 The certificate shall be substantially in the following form:
COUNTY TREASURER'S CERTIFICATE OF TAX SALE. State of Nebraska ..............
County, ss: I, .............. treasurer of the county of .............., in the
State of Nebraska, do hereby certify that the following described real estate
in such county and state: (describe the same) was, on the .......... day
of .......... 20...., duly sold by me in the manner provided by law for the
delinquent taxes for the years .....(list years)..... thereon, amounting
to .......... dollars, including interest thereon, and costs allowed by law,
to ........... for the sum of .......... dollars. I further certify that unless
redemption is made of such real estate in the manner provided by law,
the .........., heirs or assigns will be entitled to a deed therefor on and
after the .......... day of .......... A.D. 20...., on surrender of this
certificate, and compliance with the provisions required by law, on and after
the .......... day of .......... A.D. 20...., for real property determined to
be vacant and abandoned pursuant to section 77-1837, or on and after
the .......... day of .......... A.D. 20...., for any other real property.
In witness whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this .......... day
of .......... A.D. 20.... .
(L.S.) ....................., Treasurer.
Sec. 24. Section 77-1823, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
77-1823 The county treasurer shall charge a twenty-five-dollar twenty-
dollar issuance fee for each deed or certificate made by him or her for a sale
of real property for taxes together with the fee of the notary public or other
officer acknowledging the deed. The issuance fee shall not be required if the
tax sale certificate is issued in the name of the county, but the issuance fee
is due from the purchaser when the county assigns the certificate to another
person. The fee is not refundable upon redemption. Whenever the county
treasurer makes a deed to any real property sold for taxes, he or she shall
enter an account thereof in the record opposite the description of the real
property conveyed.
Sec. 25. Section 77-1825, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
77-1825 The county treasurer shall enter a memorandum of redemption of
real property in the record and shall give a receipt therefor to the person
redeeming the same , for which the county treasurer may charge a fee of two
dollars. The county treasurer shall send written notice of redemption to the
holder of the county treasurer's certificate of tax sale by first-class mail if
the post office address of the holder of the certificate is filed in the office
of the county treasurer or by electronic means if previously agreed to by the
parties. The redemption money shall be paid to or upon the order of the holder
on return of the certificate.
Sec. 26. Section 77-1829, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
77-1829 If any purchaser of real property sold for taxes under sections
77-1801 to 77-1860 suffers the same to be again sold for taxes before the
expiration of the last day of the second annual sale thereafter, such purchaser
shall not be entitled to a deed for such real property until the expiration of
a like term from the date of the second sale, during which time the real
property shall be subject to redemption upon the terms and conditions
prescribed by law. This section shall not apply to real property determined to
be vacant and abandoned pursuant to section 77-1837.
Sec. 27. Section 77-1831, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
77-1831 No purchaser at any sale for taxes or his or her assignees shall
be entitled to a tax deed from the county treasurer for the real property so
purchased unless such purchaser or assignee, at least three months before
applying for the tax deed, serves or causes to be served a notice that states,
after the expiration of at least three months from the date of service of such
notice, the tax deed will be applied for.
The notice shall include:
(1) The following statement in sixteen-point type: UNLESS YOU ACT YOU WILL
LOSE THIS PROPERTY;
(2) The date when the purchaser purchased the real property sold by the
county for taxes;
(3) The description of the real property;
(4) In whose name the real property was assessed;
(5) The amount of taxes represented by the tax sale certificate, the year
the taxes were levied or assessed, and a statement that subsequent taxes may
have been paid and interest and fees may have accrued as of the date the notice
is signed by the purchaser; and
(6) The following statements:
(a) That the issuance of a tax deed is subject to the right of redemption
under sections 77-1824 to 77-1830;
(b) The right of redemption requires payment to the county treasurer, for
the use of such purchaser, or his or her heirs or assigns, the amount of taxes
represented by the tax sale certificate for the year the taxes were levied or
assessed and any subsequent taxes paid and interest accrued as of the date
payment is made to the county treasurer; and
(c) The right of redemption expires at the close of business on the date
of application for the tax deed, and a deed may be applied for after the
expiration of three months from the date of service of this notice.
Sec. 28. Section 77-1832, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
-10-

LB650 LB650
2025 2025
amended to read:
77-1832 (1) Service of the notice provided by section 77-1831 shall be
made by:
(a) Personal or residence service as described in section 25-505.01 upon a
person in actual possession or occupancy of the real property and upon the
person in whose name the title to the real property appears of record who can
be found in this state. If a person in actual possession or occupancy of the
real property cannot be served by personal or residence service, service of the
notice shall be made upon such person by certified mail service or designated
delivery service as described in section 25-505.01, and the notice shall be
sent to the address of the property. If the person in whose name the title to
the real property appears of record cannot be found in this state or if such
person cannot be served by personal or residence service, service of the notice
shall be made upon such person by certified mail service or designated delivery
service as described in section 25-505.01, and the notice shall be sent to the
name and address to which the property tax statement was mailed. If the real
property has been determined to be vacant and abandoned pursuant to section
77-1837, then certified mail service or designated delivery service shall not
be used to serve any person with notice under this subdivision until three
unsuccessful attempts at personal or residence service have been made; and
(b) Certified mail or designated delivery service as described in section
25-505.01 upon every encumbrancer of record found by the title search required
in section 77-1833. The notice shall be sent to the encumbrancer's name and
address appearing of record as shown in the encumbrance filed with the register
of deeds.
(2) Personal or residence service shall be made by the county sheriff of
the county where service is made or by a person authorized by section 25-507.
The sheriff or other person serving the notice shall be entitled to the
statutory fee prescribed in section 33-117.
Sec. 29. Section 77-1833, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
77-1833 The service of notice provided by section 77-1832 shall be proved
by affidavit. The purchaser or assignee shall also affirm in the affidavit that
a title search was conducted by a registered abstracter to determine those
persons entitled to notice pursuant to such section. If personal or residence
service is used, the receipt or returns provided by the person authorized in
subsection (2) of section 77-1832 to carry out such service shall be filed with
and accompany the affidavit. If certified mail or designated delivery service
is used, the certified mail return receipt or a copy of the signed delivery
receipt shall be filed with and accompany the affidavit. The affidavit, a copy
of the notice, and a copy of such title search shall be filed with the
application for the tax deed pursuant to section 77-1837. For each service of
such notice, a fee of one dollar shall be allowed. The amount of such fees
shall be noted by the county treasurer in the record opposite the real property
described in the notice and shall be collected by the county treasurer in case
of redemption for the benefit of the holder of the certificate.
Sec. 30. Section 77-1836, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
77-1836 If any person is compelled to publish notice in a newspaper as
provided in sections 77-1834 and 77-1835, then before any person who may have a
right to redeem such real property from such sale is permitted to redeem, he or
she shall pay the officer or person who by law is authorized to receive such
redemption money the amount paid for publishing such notice, for the use of the
person compelled to publish the notice. The fee for such publication shall not
exceed twenty five dollars for each item of real property contained in such
notice. The cost of making such publication shall be noted by the county
treasurer in the record opposite the real property described in the notice.
Sec. 31. Section 77-1837, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
77-1837 (1) The At any time within nine months after the expiration of
three years after the date of sale of any real estate for taxes or special
assessments, if such real estate has not been redeemed and the requirements of
subsection (2) of this section have been met, the purchaser of real estate sold
for taxes or his or her assignee may apply to the county treasurer for a tax
deed for the real estate described in such purchaser's or assignee's tax sale
certificate if such real estate has not been redeemed and if the requirements
of subsection (3) of this section have been met. Such purchaser or assignee
shall apply within whichever of the following two timeframes is applicable:
(a) For real estate determined to be vacant and abandoned pursuant to
subsection (5) of this section, the purchaser or assignee shall apply at any
time within nine months after the expiration of two years after the date of
sale of the real estate for taxes or special assessments; or
(b) For any other real estate, the purchaser or assignee shall apply at
any time within nine months after the expiration of three years after the date
of sale of the real estate for taxes or special assessments.
(2) The county treasurer shall execute and deliver a deed of conveyance
for the real estate described in the such tax sale certificate if he or she has
received the following:
(a) The tax sale certificate;
(b) The issuance fee for the tax deed and the fee of the notary public or
other officer acknowledging the tax deed, as required under section 77-1823;
(c) The affidavit proving personal service of the notice required in
subsection (2) of section 77-1818;
-11-

LB650 LB650
2025 2025
(c) (d) For any notice provided pursuant to section 77-1832, the affidavit
proving service of notice, the copy of the notice, and the copy of the title
search required under section 77-1833; and
(d) (e) For any notice provided by publication pursuant to section
77-1834, the affidavit of the publisher, manager, or other employee of the
newspaper, the copy of the notice, the affidavit of the purchaser or assignee,
and the copy of the title search required under section 77-1835; .
(e) An affidavit of the purchaser or his or her assignee that the value of
the property complies with subsection (3) of this section; and
(f) For any real estate determined to be vacant and abandoned pursuant to
subsection (5) of this section, the affidavit of the purchaser or assignee
affirming that the real estate is vacant and abandoned.
(3) (2) The purchaser or his or her assignee may apply for a tax deed
under this section if one hundred ten percent of the assessed value of the real
estate described in the tax sale certificate as reflected in the records of the
county assessor at the time of the application for the tax deed, less the
amount that would be needed to redeem such real estate, is twenty-five thousand
dollars or less. If such requirement is not met, the purchaser or his or her
assignee shall foreclose the lien represented by the tax sale certificate
pursuant to section 77-1902.
(4) (3) The failure of the county treasurer to issue the deed of
conveyance if requested within the applicable timeframe provided in subsection
(1) of this section shall not impair the validity of such deed if there has
otherwise been compliance with sections 77-1801 to 77-1863.
(5)(a) For purposes of this section, real estate may be considered vacant
and abandoned if:
(i) The purchaser or assignee in question is a land bank as defined in
section 18-3403; and
(ii) Such property substantially meets more than two of the following
criteria:
(A) The property is not occupied by the owner or any lessee or licensee of
the owner;
(B) Utility service to the property, including, but not limited to, gas,
electric, or water service, has been disconnected or delinquent for over one
year;
(C) A building on the property has been deemed unfit for human habitation,
occupancy, or use by local housing officials;
(D) A building on the property is open and unprotected and in reasonable
danger of significant damage resulting from exposure to the elements or
vandalism;
(E) A building on the property is unsecure due to multiple windows and
doors being boarded up or closed off, smashed through, broken off or unhinged,
or continuously unlocked;
(F) The property has been stripped of copper or other materials or
interior fixtures to the property have been removed;
(G) There have not been any recent efforts made to restore the property to
productive use;
(H) There is a presence of vermin, uncut vegetation, or debris
accumulation on the property;
(I) There have been past actions by the applicable municipality or county
to maintain the grounds or a building on the property;
(J) The property has been out of compliance with orders of local housing
officials; or
(K) Any other condition or circumstance reasonably indicating that the
property is vacant and abandoned.
(b) The purchaser or assignee shall determine whether or not real estate
is vacant and abandoned two years after the date of the sale of such real
estate for taxes or special assessments.
(c) If the real estate is registered as vacant and abandoned pursuant to a
vacant property registration ordinance adopted by a municipality, it shall be
conclusive proof that such real estate is vacant and abandoned. If the real
estate is not registered as vacant and abandoned pursuant to such an ordinance,
the purchaser or assignee shall not be obligated to proceed under subdivision
(1)(a) of this section, but may instead choose to proceed under subdivision (1)
(b) of this section, and no tax deed subsequently issued to such purchaser or
assignee shall be deemed invalid due to noncompliance with subdivision (1)(a)
of this section. No action taken by a purchaser or assignee under subdivision
(1)(a) of this section shall prohibit a subsequent action under subdivision (1)
(b) of this section on the same real estate should it be determined that such
real estate is not vacant and abandoned.
(d) If the purchaser or assignee determines real estate to be vacant and
abandoned pursuant to this subsection, the purchaser or assignee shall submit
an affidavit to the county treasurer affirming that the real estate is vacant
and abandoned.
Sec. 32. Section 77-1838, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
77-1838 (1) The deed made by the county treasurer shall be under the
official seal of office and acknowledged by the county treasurer before some
officer authorized to take the acknowledgment of deeds. When so executed and
acknowledged, it shall be recorded in the same manner as other conveyances of
real estate. When recorded it shall vest in the grantee and his or her heirs
and assigns the title of the property described in the deed, subject to any
lien on real estate for special assessments levied by a sanitary and
-12-

LB650 LB650
2025 2025
improvement district which special assessments have not been previously offered
for sale by the county treasurer.
(2) Within thirty days after recording of the deed, the grantee shall pay
the surplus to the previous owner of the property described in the deed. For
purposes of this subsection, the surplus shall be calculated as follows:
(a) If the property has been sold since recording of the deed, the surplus
shall be equal to the amount received from such sale, minus (i) the amount that
would have been needed to redeem such property, (ii) the amount needed to pay
all encumbrances on such property, and (iii) an administrative fee of five
hundred dollars or reasonable attorney's fees in the event of judicial
foreclosure, which may be retained by the grantee to offset the costs incurred
in obtaining the deed; or
(b) If the property has not been sold since recording of the deed, the
surplus shall be equal to the assessed value of such property as reflected in
the records of the county assessor at the time of the application for the tax
deed, minus (i) the amount that would have been needed to redeem such property,
(ii) the amount needed to pay all encumbrances on such property, and (iii) an
administrative fee of five hundred dollars or reasonable attorney's fees in the
event of judicial foreclosure, which may be retained by the grantee to offset
the costs incurred in obtaining the deed.
Sec. 33. Section 77-1856, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
77-1856 If the owner of any tax sale certificate fails or neglects to
demand a deed thereon or to commence an action for the foreclosure of the same
within the time specified in subdivision (1)(b) of section 77-1837 or
subdivision (2)(b) of section 77-1902, such tax sale certificate shall cease to
be valid or of any force or effect whatever and the real property covered
thereby shall be forever released and discharged from the lien of all taxes for
which the real property was sold. It is made the duty of each and every county
treasurer of the State of Nebraska to enter on the tax sale records of his or
her office a cancellation of all tax sales on which the time specified in
subdivision (1)(b) of section 77-1837 or subdivision (2)(b) of section 77-1902
has elapsed since date of sale, with date of entry affixed, in language
substantially as follows: Canceled by section 77-1856. No county treasurer or
bonded abstracter shall be held responsible on his or her bond or otherwise on
account of such entry being made in accordance with this section. All real
property covered by tax sales that comes within the provisions of sections
77-1801 to 77-1860 shall from the time of this entry be considered to stand of
record as though no tax sale had ever been made.
Sec. 34. Section 77-1902, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
77-1902 (1) When land has been sold for delinquent taxes and a tax sale
certificate or tax deed has been issued, the holder of such tax sale
certificate or tax deed may, instead of demanding a deed or, if a deed has been
issued, by surrendering the same in court, proceed in the district court of the
county in which the land is situated to foreclose the lien for taxes
represented by the tax sale certificate or tax deed and all subsequent tax
liens thereon, excluding any lien on real estate for special assessments levied
by any sanitary and improvement district which special assessments have not
been previously offered for sale by the county treasurer, in the same manner
and with like effect as in the foreclosure of a real estate mortgage, except as
otherwise specifically provided by sections 77-1903 to 77-1917.
(2) Such action shall be brought within whichever of the following two
timeframes is applicable:
(a) For real estate determined to be vacant and abandoned pursuant to
subsection (3) of this section, the action shall be brought within nine months
after the expiration of two years from the date of sale of the real estate for
taxes or special assessments; or
(b) For any other real estate, the action shall only be brought within
nine months after the expiration of three years from the date of sale of the
any real estate for taxes or special assessments.
(3)(a) For purposes of this section, real estate may be considered vacant
and abandoned if:
(i) The holder of the tax sale certificate or tax deed is a land bank as
defined in section 18-3403; and
(ii) Such property substantially meets more than two of the following
criteria:
(A) The property is not occupied by the owner or any lessee or licensee of
the owner;
(B) Utility service to the property, including, but not limited to, gas,
electric, or water service, has been disconnected or delinquent for over one
year;
(C) A building on the property has been deemed unfit for human habitation,
occupancy, or use by local housing officials;
(D) A building on the property is open and unprotected and in reasonable
danger of significant damage resulting from exposure to the elements or
vandalism;
(E) A building on the property is unsecure due to multiple windows and
doors being boarded up or closed off, smashed through, broken off or unhinged,
or continuously unlocked;
(F) The property has been stripped of copper or other materials or
interior fixtures to the property have been removed;
(G) There have not been any recent efforts made to restore the property to
-13-

LB650 LB650
2025 2025
productive use;
(H) There is a presence of vermin, uncut vegetation, or debris
accumulation on the property;
(I) There have been past actions by the applicable municipality or county
to maintain the grounds or a building on the property;
(J) The property has been out of compliance with orders of local housing
officials; or
(K) Any other condition or circumstance reasonably indicating that the
property is vacant and abandoned.
(b) The holder of the tax sale certificate or tax deed shall determine
whether or not real estate is vacant and abandoned two years after the date of
the sale of such real estate for taxes or special assessments.
(c) If the real estate is registered as vacant and abandoned pursuant to a
vacant property registration ordinance adopted by a municipality, it shall be
conclusive proof that such real estate is vacant and abandoned. If the real
estate is not registered as vacant and abandoned pursuant to such an ordinance,
the holder of the tax sale certificate or tax deed shall not be obligated to
proceed under subdivision (2)(a) of this section, but may instead choose to
proceed under subdivision (2)(b) of this section, and no deed subsequently
issued to such holder shall be deemed invalid due to noncompliance with
subdivision (2)(a) of this section. No action taken by a holder of a tax sale
certificate or tax deed under subdivision (2)(a) of this section shall prohibit
a subsequent action under subdivision (2)(b) of this section on the same real
estate should it be determined that such real estate is not vacant and
abandoned.
(d) If the holder of the tax sale certificate or tax deed determines real
estate to be vacant and abandoned pursuant to this subsection, the holder shall
submit an affidavit to the county treasurer affirming that the real estate is
vacant and abandoned.
Sec. 35. Section 77-1909, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
77-1909 In its decree, the court shall ascertain and determine the amount
of taxes, special assessments, and other liens, interest, and costs chargeable
to each particular item of real property, excluding any lien on real estate for
special assessments levied by any sanitary and improvement district which
special assessments have not been previously offered for sale by the county
treasurer, and award to the plaintiff an attorney's fee, unless waived by the
plaintiff, in an amount equal to ten percent of the amount due plus, for good
cause shown, reasonable attorney's fees in excess of the ten percent, which
shall be taxed as part of the costs in the action and apportioned equitably as
other costs.
Sec. 36. Section 77-2701.16, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
77-2701.16 (1) Gross receipts means the total amount of the sale or lease
or rental price, as the case may be, of the retail sales of retailers.
(2) Gross receipts of every person engaged as a public utility specified
in this subsection, as a community antenna television service operator, or as a
satellite service operator or any person involved in connecting and installing
services defined in subdivision (2)(a), (b), or (d) of this section means:
(a)(i) In the furnishing of telephone communication service, other than
mobile telecommunications service as described in section 77-2703.04, the gross
income received from furnishing ancillary services, except for conference
bridging services, and intrastate telecommunications services, except for
value-added, nonvoice data service.
(ii) In the furnishing of mobile telecommunications service as described
in section 77-2703.04, the gross income received from furnishing mobile
telecommunications service that originates and terminates in the same state to
a customer with a place of primary use in Nebraska;
(b) In the furnishing of telegraph service, the gross income received from
the furnishing of intrastate telegraph services;
(c)(i) In the furnishing of gas, sewer, water, and electricity service,
other than electricity service to a customer-generator as defined in section
70-2002, the gross income received from the furnishing of such services upon
billings or statements rendered to consumers for such utility services.
(ii) In the furnishing of electricity service to a customer-generator as
defined in section 70-2002, the net energy use upon billings or statements
rendered to customer-generators for such electricity service;
(d) In the furnishing of community antenna television service or satellite
service, the gross income received from the furnishing of such community
antenna television service as regulated under sections 18-2201 to 18-2205 or
23-383 to 23-388 or satellite service; and
(e) The gross income received from the provision, installation,
construction, servicing, or removal of property used in conjunction with the
furnishing, installing, or connecting of any public utility services specified
in subdivision (2)(a) or (b) of this section or community antenna television
service or satellite service specified in subdivision (2)(d) of this section,
except when acting as a subcontractor for a public utility, this subdivision
does not apply to the gross income received by a contractor electing to be
treated as a consumer of building materials under subdivision (2) or (3) of
section 77-2701.10 for any such services performed on the customer's side of
the utility demarcation point. This subdivision also does not apply to:
(i) The gross income received by a political subdivision of the state, an
electric cooperative, or an electric membership association for the lease or
-14-

LB650 LB650
2025 2025
use of, or by a contractor for the construction of or services provided on,
electric generation, transmission, distribution, or street lighting structures
or facilities owned by a political subdivision of the state, an electric
cooperative, or an electric membership association; or
(ii) The gross income received for the lease or use of towers or other
structures and equipment, including antennas and studio transmitter link
systems, primarily used in conjunction with the furnishing of (A) Internet
access services, (B) agricultural global positioning system locating services,
or (C) over-the-air radio and television broadcasting via radio and television
broadcast stations licensed by the Federal Communications Commission ,
including antennas and studio transmitter link systems. For purposes of this
subdivision, studio transmitter link system means a radiofrequency apparatus
system which serves as a conduit to deliver station programming content audio
from its origin in a studio to a broadcast transmitter and antenna.
(3) Gross receipts of every person engaged in selling, leasing, or
otherwise providing intellectual or entertainment property means:
(a) In the furnishing of computer software, the gross income received,
including the charges for coding, punching, or otherwise producing any computer
software and the charges for the tapes, disks, punched cards, or other
properties furnished by the seller; and
(b) In the furnishing of videotapes, movie film, satellite programming,
satellite programming service, and satellite television signal descrambling or
decoding devices, the gross income received from the license, franchise, or
other method establishing the charge.
(4) Gross receipts for providing a service means:
(a) The gross income received for building cleaning and maintenance, pest
control, and security;
(b) The gross income received for motor vehicle washing, waxing, towing,
and painting;
(c) The gross income received for computer software training;
(d) The gross income received for installing and applying tangible
personal property if the sale of the property is subject to tax. If any or all
of the charge for installation is free to the customer and is paid by a third-
party service provider to the installer, any tax due on that part of the
activation commission, finder's fee, installation charge, or similar payment
made by the third-party service provider shall be paid and remitted by the
third-party service provider;
(e) The gross income received for services of recreational vehicle parks;
(f) The gross income received for labor for repair or maintenance services
performed with regard to tangible personal property the sale of which would be
subject to sales and use taxes, excluding motor vehicles, except as otherwise
provided in section 77-2704.26 or 77-2704.50;
(g) The gross income received for animal specialty services except (i)
veterinary services, (ii) specialty services performed on livestock as defined
in section 54-183, and (iii) animal grooming performed by a licensed
veterinarian or a licensed veterinary technician in conjunction with medical
treatment; and
(h) The gross income received for detective services.
(5) Gross receipts includes the sale of admissions. When an admission to
an activity or a membership constituting an admission is combined with the
solicitation of a contribution, the portion or the amount charged representing
the fair market price of the admission shall be considered a retail sale
subject to the tax imposed by section 77-2703. The organization conducting the
activity shall determine the amount properly attributable to the purchase of
the privilege, benefit, or other consideration in advance, and such amount
shall be clearly indicated on any ticket, receipt, or other evidence issued in
connection with the payment.
(6) Gross receipts includes the sale of live plants incorporated into real
estate except when such incorporation is incidental to the transfer of an
improvement upon real estate or the real estate.
(7) Gross receipts includes the sale of any building materials annexed to
real estate by a person electing to be taxed as a retailer pursuant to
subdivision (1) of section 77-2701.10.
(8) Gross receipts includes the sale of and recharge of prepaid calling
service and prepaid wireless calling service.
(9) Gross receipts includes the retail sale of digital audio works,
digital audiovisual works, digital codes, and digital books delivered
electronically if the products are taxable when delivered on tangible storage
media. A sale includes the transfer of a permanent right of use, the transfer
of a right of use that terminates on some condition, and the transfer of a
right of use conditioned upon the receipt of continued payments.
(10) Gross receipts includes any receipts from sales of tangible personal
property made over a multivendor marketplace platform that acts as the
intermediary by facilitating sales between a seller and the purchaser and that,
either directly or indirectly through agreements or arrangements with third
parties, collects payment from the purchaser and transmits payment to the
seller.
(11) Gross receipts does not include:
(a) The amount of any rebate granted by a motor vehicle or motorboat
manufacturer or dealer at the time of sale of the motor vehicle or motorboat,
which rebate functions as a discount from the sales price of the motor vehicle
or motorboat; or
(b) The price of property or services returned or rejected by customers
-15-

LB650 LB650
2025 2025
when the full sales price is refunded either in cash or credit.
Sec. 37. Section 77-2703, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
77-2703 (1) There is hereby imposed a tax at the rate provided in section
77-2701.02 upon the gross receipts from all sales of tangible personal property
sold at retail in this state; the gross receipts of every person engaged as a
public utility, as a community antenna television service operator, or as a
satellite service operator, any person involved in the connecting and
installing of the services defined in subdivision (2)(a), (b), (d), or (e) of
section 77-2701.16, or every person engaged as a retailer of intellectual or
entertainment properties referred to in subsection (3) of section 77-2701.16;
the gross receipts from the sale of admissions in this state; the gross
receipts from the sale of warranties, guarantees, service agreements, or
maintenance agreements when the items covered are subject to tax under this
section; beginning January 1, 2008, the gross receipts from the sale of bundled
transactions when one or more of the products included in the bundle are
taxable; the gross receipts from the provision of services defined in
subsection (4) of section 77-2701.16; and the gross receipts from the sale of
products delivered electronically as described in subsection (9) of section
77-2701.16. Except as provided in section 77-2701.03, when there is a sale, the
tax shall be imposed at the rate in effect at the time the gross receipts are
realized under the accounting basis used by the retailer to maintain his or her
books and records.
(a) The tax imposed by this section shall be collected by the retailer
from the consumer. It shall constitute a part of the purchase price and until
collected shall be a debt from the consumer to the retailer and shall be
recoverable at law in the same manner as other debts. The tax required to be
collected by the retailer from the consumer constitutes a debt owed by the
retailer to this state.
(b) It is unlawful for any retailer to advertise, hold out, or state to
the public or to any customer, directly or indirectly, that the tax or part
thereof will be assumed or absorbed by the retailer, that it will not be added
to the selling, renting, or leasing price of the property sold, rented, or
leased, or that, if added, it or any part thereof will be refunded. The
provisions of this subdivision shall not apply to a public utility.
(c) The tax required to be collected by the retailer from the purchaser,
unless otherwise provided by statute or by rule and regulation of the Tax
Commissioner, shall be displayed separately from the list price, the price
advertised in the premises, the marked price, or other price on the sales check
or other proof of sales, rentals, or leases.
(d) For the purpose of more efficiently securing the payment, collection,
and accounting for the sales tax and for the convenience of the retailer in
collecting the sales tax, it shall be the duty of the Tax Commissioner to
provide a schedule or schedules of the amounts to be collected from the
consumer or user to effectuate the computation and collection of the tax
imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967. Such schedule or schedules shall
provide that the tax shall be collected from the consumer or user uniformly on
sales according to brackets based on sales prices of the item or items.
Retailers may compute the tax due on any transaction on an item or an invoice
basis. The rounding rule provided in section 77-3,117 applies.
(e) The use of tokens or stamps for the purpose of collecting or enforcing
the collection of the taxes imposed in the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 or for
any other purpose in connection with such taxes is prohibited.
(f) For the purpose of the proper administration of the provisions of the
Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 and to prevent evasion of the retail sales tax, it
shall be presumed that all gross receipts are subject to the tax until the
contrary is established. The burden of proving that a sale of property is not a
sale at retail is upon the person who makes the sale unless he or she takes
from the purchaser (i) a resale certificate to the effect that the property is
purchased for the purpose of reselling, leasing, or renting it, (ii) an
exemption certificate pursuant to subsection (7) of section 77-2705, or (iii) a
direct payment permit pursuant to sections 77-2705.01 to 77-2705.03. Receipt of
a resale certificate, exemption certificate, or direct payment permit shall be
conclusive proof for the seller that the sale was made for resale or was exempt
or that the tax will be paid directly to the state.
(g) In the rental or lease of automobiles, trucks, trailers, semitrailers,
and truck-tractors as defined in the Motor Vehicle Registration Act, the tax
shall be collected by the lessor on the rental or lease price, except as
otherwise provided within this section.
(h) In the rental or lease of automobiles, trucks, trailers, semitrailers,
and truck-tractors as defined in the act, for periods of one year or more, the
lessor may elect not to collect and remit the sales tax on the gross receipts
and instead pay a sales tax on the cost of such vehicle. If such election is
made, it shall be made pursuant to the following conditions:
(i) Notice of the desire to make such election shall be filed with the Tax
Commissioner and shall not become effective until the Tax Commissioner is
satisfied that the taxpayer has complied with all conditions of this subsection
and all rules and regulations of the Tax Commissioner;
(ii) Such election when made shall continue in force and effect for a
period of not less than two years and thereafter until such time as the lessor
elects to terminate the election;
(iii) When such election is made, it shall apply to all vehicles of the
lessor rented or leased for periods of one year or more except vehicles to be
-16-

LB650 LB650
2025 2025
leased to common or contract carriers who provide to the lessor a valid common
or contract carrier exemption certificate. If the lessor rents or leases other
vehicles for periods of less than one year, such lessor shall maintain his or
her books and records and his or her accounting procedure as the Tax
Commissioner prescribes; and
(iv) The Tax Commissioner by rule and regulation shall prescribe the
contents and form of the notice of election, a procedure for the determination
of the tax base of vehicles which are under an existing lease at the time such
election becomes effective, the method and manner for terminating such
election, and such other rules and regulations as may be necessary for the
proper administration of this subdivision.
(i) The tax imposed by this section on the sales of motor vehicles,
semitrailers, and trailers as defined in sections 60-339, 60-348, and 60-354
shall be the liability of the purchaser and, with the exception of motor
vehicles, semitrailers, and trailers registered pursuant to section 60-3,198,
the tax shall be collected by the county treasurer as provided in the Motor
Vehicle Registration Act or by an approved licensed dealer participating in the
electronic dealer services system pursuant to section 60-1507 at the time the
purchaser makes application for the registration of the motor vehicle,
semitrailer, or trailer for operation upon the highways of this state. The tax
imposed by this section on motor vehicles, semitrailers, and trailers
registered pursuant to section 60-3,198 shall be collected by the Department of
Motor Vehicles at the time the purchaser makes application for the registration
of the motor vehicle, semitrailer, or trailer for operation upon the highways
of this state. At the time of the sale of any motor vehicle, semitrailer, or
trailer, the seller shall (i) state on the sales invoice the dollar amount of
the tax imposed under this section and (ii) furnish to the purchaser a
certified statement of the transaction, in such form as the Tax Commissioner
prescribes, setting forth as a minimum the total sales price, the allowance for
any trade-in, and the difference between the two. The sales tax due shall be
computed on the difference between the total sales price and the allowance for
any trade-in as disclosed by such certified statement. Any seller who willfully
understates the amount upon which the sales tax is due shall be subject to a
penalty of one thousand dollars. A copy of such certified statement shall also
be furnished to the Tax Commissioner. Any seller who fails or refuses to
furnish such certified statement shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall,
upon conviction thereof, be punished by a fine of not less than twenty-five
dollars nor more than one hundred dollars. If the purchaser does not register
such motor vehicle, semitrailer, or trailer for operation on the highways of
this state within thirty days of the purchase thereof, the tax imposed by this
section shall immediately thereafter be paid by the purchaser to the county
treasurer or the Department of Motor Vehicles. If the tax is not paid on or
before the thirtieth day after its purchase, the county treasurer or Department
of Motor Vehicles shall also collect from the purchaser interest from the
thirtieth day through the date of payment and sales tax penalties as provided
in the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967. The county treasurer or Department of
Motor Vehicles shall report and remit the tax so collected to the Tax
Commissioner by the fifteenth day of the following month. The county treasurer,
for his or her collection fee, shall deduct and withhold, from all amounts
required to be collected under this subsection, the collection fee permitted to
be deducted by any retailer collecting the sales tax, all of which shall be
deposited in the county general fund, plus an additional amount equal to one-
half of one percent of all amounts in excess of six thousand dollars remitted
each month. Prior to January 1, 2023, fifty percent of such additional amount
shall be deposited in the county general fund and fifty percent of such
additional amount shall be deposited in the county road fund. On and after
January 1, 2023, seventy-five percent of such additional amount shall be
deposited in the county general fund and twenty-five percent of such additional
amount shall be deposited in the county road fund. In any county with a
population of one hundred fifty thousand inhabitants or more, the county
treasurer shall remit one dollar of his or her collection fee for each of the
first five thousand motor vehicles, semitrailers, or trailers registered with
such county treasurer on or after January 1, 2020, to the State Treasurer for
credit to the Department of Revenue Enforcement Fund. The Department of Motor
Vehicles, for its collection fee, shall deduct, withhold, and deposit in the
Motor Carrier Division Cash Fund the collection fee permitted to be deducted by
any retailer collecting the sales tax. The collection fee for the county
treasurer or the Department of Motor Vehicles shall be forfeited if the county
treasurer or department violates any rule or regulation pertaining to the
collection of the use tax.
(j)(i) The tax imposed by this section on the sale of a motorboat as
defined in section 37-1204 shall be the liability of the purchaser. The tax
shall be collected by the county treasurer at the time the purchaser makes
application for the registration of the motorboat. At the time of the sale of a
motorboat, the seller shall (A) state on the sales invoice the dollar amount of
the tax imposed under this section and (B) furnish to the purchaser a certified
statement of the transaction, in such form as the Tax Commissioner prescribes,
setting forth as a minimum the total sales price, the allowance for any trade-
in, and the difference between the two. The sales tax due shall be computed on
the difference between the total sales price and the allowance for any trade-in
as disclosed by such certified statement. Any seller who willfully understates
the amount upon which the sales tax is due shall be subject to a penalty of one
thousand dollars. A copy of such certified statement shall also be furnished to
-17-

LB650 LB650
2025 2025
the Tax Commissioner. Any seller who fails or refuses to furnish such certified
statement shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall, upon conviction thereof,
be punished by a fine of not less than twenty-five dollars nor more than one
hundred dollars. If the purchaser does not register such motorboat within
thirty days of the purchase thereof, the tax imposed by this section shall
immediately thereafter be paid by the purchaser to the county treasurer. If the
tax is not paid on or before the thirtieth day after its purchase, the county
treasurer shall also collect from the purchaser interest from the thirtieth day
through the date of payment and sales tax penalties as provided in the Nebraska
Revenue Act of 1967. The county treasurer shall report and remit the tax so
collected to the Tax Commissioner by the fifteenth day of the following month.
The county treasurer, for his or her collection fee, shall deduct and withhold
for the use of the county general fund, from all amounts required to be
collected under this subsection, the collection fee permitted to be deducted by
any retailer collecting the sales tax. The collection fee shall be forfeited if
the county treasurer violates any rule or regulation pertaining to the
collection of the use tax.
(ii) In the rental or lease of motorboats, the tax shall be collected by
the lessor on the rental or lease price.
(k)(i) The tax imposed by this section on the sale of an all-terrain
vehicle as defined in section 60-103 or a utility-type vehicle as defined in
section 60-135.01 shall be the liability of the purchaser. The tax shall be
collected by the county treasurer or by an approved licensed dealer
participating in the electronic dealer services system pursuant to section
60-1507 at the time the purchaser makes application for the certificate of
title for the all-terrain vehicle or utility-type vehicle. At the time of the
sale of an all-terrain vehicle or a utility-type vehicle, the seller shall (A)
state on the sales invoice the dollar amount of the tax imposed under this
section and (B) furnish to the purchaser a certified statement of the
transaction, in such form as the Tax Commissioner prescribes, setting forth as
a minimum the total sales price, the allowance for any trade-in, and the
difference between the two. The sales tax due shall be computed on the
difference between the total sales price and the allowance for any trade-in as
disclosed by such certified statement. Any seller who willfully understates the
amount upon which the sales tax is due shall be subject to a penalty of one
thousand dollars. A copy of such certified statement shall also be furnished to
the Tax Commissioner. Any seller who fails or refuses to furnish such certified
statement shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall, upon conviction thereof,
be punished by a fine of not less than twenty-five dollars nor more than one
hundred dollars. If the purchaser does not obtain a certificate of title for
such all-terrain vehicle or utility-type vehicle within thirty days of the
purchase thereof, the tax imposed by this section shall immediately thereafter
be paid by the purchaser to the county treasurer. If the tax is not paid on or
before the thirtieth day after its purchase, the county treasurer shall also
collect from the purchaser interest from the thirtieth day through the date of
payment and sales tax penalties as provided in the Nebraska Revenue Act of
1967. The county treasurer shall report and remit the tax so collected to the
Tax Commissioner by the fifteenth day of the following month. The county
treasurer, for his or her collection fee, shall deduct and withhold for the use
of the county general fund, from all amounts required to be collected under
this subsection, the collection fee permitted to be deducted by any retailer
collecting the sales tax. The collection fee shall be forfeited if the county
treasurer violates any rule or regulation pertaining to the collection of the
use tax.
(ii) In the rental or lease of an all-terrain vehicle or a utility-type
vehicle, the tax shall be collected by the lessor on the rental or lease price.
(iii) County treasurers are appointed as sales and use tax collectors for
all sales of all-terrain vehicles or utility-type vehicles made outside of this
state to purchasers or users of all-terrain vehicles or utility-type vehicles
which are required to have a certificate of title in this state. The county
treasurer shall collect the applicable use tax from the purchaser of an all-
terrain vehicle or a utility-type vehicle purchased outside of this state at
the time application for a certificate of title is made. The full use tax on
the purchase price shall be collected by the county treasurer if a sales or
occupation tax was not paid by the purchaser in the state of purchase. If a
sales or occupation tax was lawfully paid in the state of purchase at a rate
less than the tax imposed in this state, use tax must be collected on the
difference as a condition for obtaining a certificate of title in this state.
(l) The Tax Commissioner shall adopt and promulgate necessary rules and
regulations for determining the amount subject to the taxes imposed by this
section so as to insure that the full amount of any applicable tax is paid in
cases in which a sale is made of which a part is subject to the taxes imposed
by this section and a part of which is not so subject and a separate accounting
is not practical or economical.
(2) A use tax is hereby imposed on the storage, use, or other consumption
in this state of property purchased, leased, or rented from any retailer and on
any transaction the gross receipts of which are subject to tax under subsection
(1) of this section on or after June 1, 1967, for storage, use, or other
consumption in this state at the rate set as provided in subsection (1) of this
section on the sales price of the property or, in the case of leases or
rentals, of the lease or rental prices.
(a) Every person storing, using, or otherwise consuming in this state
property purchased from a retailer or leased or rented from another person for
-18-

LB650 LB650
2025 2025
such purpose shall be liable for the use tax at the rate in effect when his or
her liability for the use tax becomes certain under the accounting basis used
to maintain his or her books and records. His or her liability shall not be
extinguished until the use tax has been paid to this state, except that a
receipt from a retailer engaged in business in this state or from a retailer
who is authorized by the Tax Commissioner, under such rules and regulations as
he or she may prescribe, to collect the sales tax and who is, for the purposes
of the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 relating to the sales tax, regarded as a
retailer engaged in business in this state, which receipt is given to the
purchaser pursuant to subdivision (b) of this subsection, shall be sufficient
to relieve the purchaser from further liability for the tax to which the
receipt refers.
(b) Every retailer engaged in business in this state and selling, leasing,
or renting property for storage, use, or other consumption in this state shall,
at the time of making any sale, collect any tax which may be due from the
purchaser and shall give to the purchaser, upon request, a receipt therefor in
the manner and form prescribed by the Tax Commissioner.
(c) The Tax Commissioner, in order to facilitate the proper administration
of the use tax, may designate such person or persons as he or she may deem
necessary to be use tax collectors and delegate to such persons such authority
as is necessary to collect any use tax which is due and payable to the State of
Nebraska. The Tax Commissioner may require of all persons so designated a
surety bond in favor of the State of Nebraska to insure against any
misappropriation of state funds so collected. The Tax Commissioner may require
any tax official, city, county, or state, to collect the use tax on behalf of
the state. All persons designated to or required to collect the use tax shall
account for such collections in the manner prescribed by the Tax Commissioner.
Nothing in this subdivision shall be so construed as to prevent the Tax
Commissioner or his or her employees from collecting any use taxes due and
payable to the State of Nebraska.
(d) All persons designated to collect the use tax and all persons required
to collect the use tax shall forward the total of such collections to the Tax
Commissioner at such time and in such manner as the Tax Commissioner may
prescribe. Such collectors of the use tax shall deduct and withhold from the
amount of taxes collected two and one-half three percent of the first three
five thousand dollars remitted each month as reimbursement for the cost of
collecting the tax. Any such deduction shall be forfeited to the State of
Nebraska if such collector violates any rule, regulation, or directive of the
Tax Commissioner.
(e) For the purpose of the proper administration of the Nebraska Revenue
Act of 1967 and to prevent evasion of the use tax, it shall be presumed that
property sold, leased, or rented by any person for delivery in this state is
sold, leased, or rented for storage, use, or other consumption in this state
until the contrary is established. The burden of proving the contrary is upon
the person who purchases, leases, or rents the property.
(f) For the purpose of the proper administration of the Nebraska Revenue
Act of 1967 and to prevent evasion of the use tax, for the sale of property to
an advertising agency which purchases the property as an agent for a disclosed
or undisclosed principal, the advertising agency is and remains liable for the
sales and use tax on the purchase the same as if the principal had made the
purchase directly.
Sec. 38. Section 77-2706.02, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
77-2706.02 (1) This section applies on and after July 1, 2026.
(2) The appointment of purchasing agents shall be recognized for the
purpose of permitting a construction contractor to purchase materials tax free
based on the buyer-based exemption of the contractor's client for items that
are physically annexed to the structure and which subsequently belong to the
client who is eligible for the buyer-based exemption. The appointment of
purchasing agents shall be in writing and occur prior to having any buyer-based
tax-exempt items annexed to real estate in the construction, improvement, or
repair. The contractor who has been appointed as a purchasing agent may
purchase the materials tax free or may apply for a refund of or use as a credit
against a future use tax liability the tax paid on inventory items annexed to
real estate in the construction, improvement, or repair of a project that
belongs to the client who is eligible for the buyer-based exemption.
(3) A client described in subsection (2) of this section which enters into
a contract of construction, improvement, or repair with respect to buyer-based
tax-exempt items annexed to real estate without first issuing a purchasing
agent authorization to a construction contractor prior to such items being
annexed to real estate in the project may apply to the Tax Commissioner for a
refund of any sales and use tax paid by the contractor on such items physically
annexed to real estate in the construction, improvement, or repair.
(4) For purposes of this section, client means a nonprofit entity.
Sec. 39. Section 77-2708, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
77-2708 (1)(a) The sales and use taxes imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act
of 1967 shall be due and payable to the Tax Commissioner monthly on or before
the twentieth day of the month next succeeding each monthly period unless
otherwise provided pursuant to the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967.
(b)(i) On or before the twentieth day of the month following each monthly
period or such other period as the Tax Commissioner may require, a return for
such period, along with all taxes due, shall be filed with the Tax Commissioner
-19-

LB650 LB650
2025 2025
in such form and content as the Tax Commissioner may prescribe and containing
such information as the Tax Commissioner deems necessary for the proper
administration of the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967. The Tax Commissioner, if he
or she deems it necessary in order to insure payment to or facilitate the
collection by the state of the amount of sales or use taxes due, may require
returns and payment of the amount of such taxes for periods other than monthly
periods in the case of a particular seller, retailer, or purchaser, as the case
may be. The Tax Commissioner shall by rule and regulation require reports and
tax payments from sellers, retailers, or purchasers depending on their yearly
tax liability. Except as required by the streamlined sales and use tax
agreement, annual returns shall be required if such sellers', retailers', or
purchasers' yearly tax liability is less than nine hundred dollars, quarterly
returns shall be required if their yearly tax liability is nine hundred dollars
or more and less than three thousand dollars, and monthly returns shall be
required if their yearly tax liability is three thousand dollars or more. The
Tax Commissioner shall have the discretion to allow an annual return for
seasonal retailers, even when their yearly tax liability exceeds the amounts
listed in this subdivision.
The Tax Commissioner may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to
allow annual, semiannual, or quarterly returns for any retailer making monthly
remittances or payments of sales and use taxes by electronic funds transfer or
for any retailer remitting tax to the state pursuant to the streamlined sales
and use tax agreement. Such rules and regulations may establish a method of
determining the amount of the payment that will result in substantially all of
the tax liability being paid each quarter. At least once each year, the
difference between the amount paid and the amount due shall be reconciled. If
the difference is more than ten percent of the amount paid, a penalty of fifty
percent of the unpaid amount shall be imposed.
(ii) For purposes of the sales tax, a return shall be filed by every
retailer liable for collection from a purchaser and payment to the state of the
tax, except that a combined sales tax return may be filed for all licensed
locations which are subject to common ownership. For purposes of this
subdivision, common ownership means the same person or persons own eighty
percent or more of each licensed location. For purposes of the use tax, a
return shall be filed by every retailer engaged in business in this state and
by every person who has purchased property, the storage, use, or other
consumption of which is subject to the use tax, but who has not paid the use
tax due to a retailer required to collect the tax.
(iii) The Tax Commissioner may require that returns be signed by the
person required to file the return or by his or her duly authorized agent but
need not be verified by oath.
(iv) A taxpayer who keeps his or her regular books and records on a cash
basis, an accrual basis, or any generally recognized accounting basis which
correctly reflects the operation of the business may file the sales and use tax
returns required by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 on the same accounting
basis that is used for the regular books and records, except that on credit,
conditional, and installment sales, the retailer who keeps his or her books on
an accrual basis may report such sales on the cash basis and pay the tax upon
the collections made during each month. If a taxpayer transfers, sells,
assigns, or otherwise disposes of an account receivable, he or she shall be
deemed to have received the full balance of the consideration for the original
sale and shall be liable for the remittance of the sales tax on the balance of
the total sale price not previously reported, except that such transfer, sale,
assignment, or other disposition of an account receivable by a retailer to a
subsidiary shall not be deemed to require the retailer to pay the sales tax on
the credit sale represented by the account transferred prior to the time the
customer makes payment on such account. If the subsidiary does not obtain a
Nebraska sales tax permit, the taxpayer shall obtain a surety bond in favor of
the State of Nebraska to insure payment of the tax and any interest and penalty
imposed thereon under this section in an amount not less than two times the
amount of tax payable on outstanding accounts receivable held by the subsidiary
as of the end of the prior calendar year. Failure to obtain either a sales tax
permit or a surety bond in accordance with this section shall result in the
payment on the next required filing date of all sales taxes not previously
remitted. When the retailer has adopted one basis or the other of reporting
credit, conditional, or installment sales and paying the tax thereon, he or she
will not be permitted to change from that basis without first having notified
the Tax Commissioner.
(c) Except as provided in the streamlined sales and use tax agreement, the
taxpayer required to file the return shall deliver or mail any required return
together with a remittance of the net amount of the tax due to the office of
the Tax Commissioner on or before the required filing date. Failure to file the
return, filing after the required filing date, failure to remit the net amount
of the tax due, or remitting the net amount of the tax due after the required
filing date shall be cause for a penalty, in addition to interest, of ten
percent of the amount of tax not paid by the required filing date or twenty-
five dollars, whichever is greater, unless the penalty is being collected under
subdivision (1)(i), (1)(j)(i), or (1)(k)(i) of section 77-2703 by a county
treasurer or the Department of Motor Vehicles, in which case the penalty shall
be five dollars.
(d) The taxpayer shall deduct and withhold, from the taxes otherwise due
from him or her on his or her tax return, two and one-half three percent of the
first three five thousand dollars remitted each month to reimburse himself or
-20-

LB650 LB650
2025 2025
herself for the cost of collecting the tax. Taxpayers filing a combined return
as allowed by subdivision (1)(b)(ii) of this subsection shall compute such
collection fees on the basis of the receipts and liability of each licensed
location.
(e) A retailer that makes sales into Nebraska using a multivendor
marketplace platform is relieved of its obligation to collect and remit sales
taxes to Nebraska with regard to any sales taxes collected and remitted by the
multivendor marketplace platform. Such a retailer must include all sales into
Nebraska in its gross receipts in its return, but may claim credit for any
sales taxes collected and remitted by the multivendor marketplace platform with
respect to such retailer's sales. Such retailer is liable for the sales tax due
on sales into Nebraska as provided in section 77-2704.35.
(f) A multivendor marketplace platform is relieved of its obligation to
collect and remit the correct amount of state and local sales taxes to Nebraska
to the extent that the multivendor marketplace platform can establish that the
error was due to insufficient or incorrect information given to the multivendor
marketplace platform by the seller and relied on by the multivendor marketplace
platform. This subdivision shall not apply if the multivendor marketplace
platform and the seller are related persons under either section 267(b) or (c)
or section 707(b) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 or if the seller is also
the multivendor marketplace platform operator.
(2)(a) If the Tax Commissioner determines that any sales or use tax
amount, penalty, or interest has been paid more than once, has been erroneously
or illegally collected or computed, or has been paid and the purchaser
qualifies for a refund under section 77-2708.01, the Tax Commissioner shall set
forth that fact in his or her records and the excess amount collected or paid
may be credited on any sales, use, or income tax amounts then due and payable
from the person under the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967. Any balance may be
refunded to the person by whom it was paid or his or her successors,
administrators, or executors.
(b) No refund shall be allowed unless a claim therefor is filed with the
Tax Commissioner by the person who made the overpayment or his or her attorney,
executor, or administrator within three years from the required filing date
following the close of the period for which the overpayment was made, within
six months after any determination becomes final under section 77-2709, or
within six months from the date of overpayment with respect to such
determinations, whichever of these three periods expires later, unless the
credit relates to a period for which a waiver has been given. Failure to file a
claim within the time prescribed in this subsection shall constitute a waiver
of any demand against the state on account of overpayment.
(c) Every claim shall be in writing on forms prescribed by the Tax
Commissioner and shall state the specific amount and grounds upon which the
claim is founded. No refund shall be made in any amount less than two dollars.
(d) The Tax Commissioner shall allow or disallow a claim within one
hundred eighty days after it has been filed. A request for a hearing shall
constitute a waiver of the one-hundred-eighty-day period. The claimant and the
Tax Commissioner may also agree to extend the one-hundred-eighty-day period. If
a hearing has not been requested and the Tax Commissioner has neither allowed
nor disallowed a claim within either the one hundred eighty days or the period
agreed to by the claimant and the Tax Commissioner, the claim shall be deemed
to have been allowed.
(e) Within thirty days after disallowing any claim in whole or in part,
the Tax Commissioner shall serve notice of his or her action on the claimant in
the manner prescribed for service of notice of a deficiency determination.
(f) Within thirty days after the mailing of the notice of the Tax
Commissioner's action upon a claim filed pursuant to the Nebraska Revenue Act
of 1967, the action of the Tax Commissioner shall be final unless the taxpayer
seeks review of the Tax Commissioner's determination as provided in section
77-27,127.
(g) Upon the allowance of a credit or refund of any sum erroneously or
illegally assessed or collected, of any penalty collected without authority, or
of any sum which was excessive or in any manner wrongfully collected, interest
shall be allowed and paid on the amount of such credit or refund at the rate
specified in section 45-104.02, as such rate may from time to time be adjusted,
from the date such sum was paid or from the date the return was required to be
filed, whichever date is later, to the date of the allowance of the refund or,
in the case of a credit, to the due date of the amount against which the credit
is allowed, but in the case of a voluntary and unrequested payment in excess of
actual tax liability or a refund under section 77-2708.01, no interest shall be
allowed when such excess is refunded or credited.
(h) No suit or proceeding shall be maintained in any court for the
recovery of any amount alleged to have been erroneously or illegally determined
or collected unless a claim for refund or credit has been duly filed.
(i) The Tax Commissioner may recover any refund or part thereof which is
erroneously made and any credit or part thereof which is erroneously allowed by
issuing a deficiency determination within one year from the date of refund or
credit or within the period otherwise allowed for issuing a deficiency
determination, whichever expires later.
(j)(i) Credit shall be allowed to the retailer, contractor, or
repairperson for sales or use taxes paid pursuant to the Nebraska Revenue Act
of 1967 on any deduction taken that is attributed to bad debts not including
interest. Bad debt has the same meaning as in 26 U.S.C. 166, as such section
existed on January 1, 2003. However, the amount calculated pursuant to 26
-21-

LB650 LB650
2025 2025
U.S.C. 166 shall be adjusted to exclude: Financing charges or interest; sales
or use taxes charged on the purchase price; uncollectible amounts on property
that remains in the possession of the seller until the full purchase price is
paid; and expenses incurred in attempting to collect any debt and repossessed
property.
(ii) Bad debts may be deducted on the return for the period during which
the bad debt is written off as uncollectible in the claimant's books and
records and is eligible to be deducted for federal income tax purposes. A
claimant who is not required to file federal income tax returns may deduct a
bad debt on a return filed for the period in which the bad debt is written off
as uncollectible in the claimant's books and records and would be eligible for
a bad debt deduction for federal income tax purposes if the claimant was
required to file a federal income tax return.
(iii) If a deduction is taken for a bad debt and the debt is subsequently
collected in whole or in part, the tax on the amount so collected must be paid
and reported on the return filed for the period in which the collection is
made.
(iv) When the amount of bad debt exceeds the amount of taxable sales for
the period during which the bad debt is written off, a refund claim may be
filed within the otherwise applicable statute of limitations for refund claims.
The statute of limitations shall be measured from the due date of the return on
which the bad debt could first be claimed.
(v) If filing responsibilities have been assumed by a certified service
provider, the service provider may claim, on behalf of the retailer, any bad
debt allowance provided by this section. The certified service provider shall
credit or refund the full amount of any bad debt allowance or refund received
to the retailer.
(vi) For purposes of reporting a payment received on a previously claimed
bad debt, any payments made on a debt or account are applied first
proportionally to the taxable price of the property or service and the sales
tax thereon, and secondly to interest, service charges, and any other charges.
(vii) In situations in which the books and records of the party claiming
the bad debt allowance support an allocation of the bad debts among the member
states in the streamlined sales and use tax agreement, the state shall permit
the allocation.
(3) Beginning July 1, 2020, if a refund claim under this section involves
a refund of a tax imposed under the Local Option Revenue Act or section 13-319,
13-2813, or 77-6403 and the amount of such tax to be refunded is at least five
thousand dollars, the Tax Commissioner shall notify the affected city, village,
county, or municipal county of such claim within twenty days after receiving
the claim. If the Tax Commissioner allows the claim and the refund of such tax
is at least five thousand dollars, the Tax Commissioner shall notify the
affected city, village, county, or municipal county of such refund and shall
give the city, village, county, or municipal county the option of having such
refund deducted from its tax proceeds in one lump sum or in twelve equal
monthly installments. The city, village, county, or municipal county shall make
its selection and shall certify the selection to the Tax Commissioner within
twenty days after receiving notice of the refund. The Tax Commissioner shall
then deduct such refund from the applicable tax proceeds in accordance with the
selection when he or she deducts refunds pursuant to section 13-324, 13-2814,
or 77-6403 or subsection (1) of section 77-27,144, whichever is applicable.
This subsection shall not apply to any refund that is subject to subdivision
(2)(a) or (2)(b)(ii) or subsection (3) or (4) of section 77-27,144.
Sec. 40. Section 77-2711, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
77-2711 (1)(a) The Tax Commissioner shall enforce sections 77-2701.04 to
77-2713 and may prescribe, adopt, and enforce rules and regulations relating to
the administration and enforcement of such sections.
(b) The Tax Commissioner may prescribe the extent to which any ruling or
regulation shall be applied without retroactive effect.
(2) The Tax Commissioner may employ accountants, auditors, investigators,
assistants, and clerks necessary for the efficient administration of the
Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 and may delegate authority to his or her
representatives to conduct hearings, prescribe regulations, or perform any
other duties imposed by such act.
(3)(a) Every seller, every retailer, and every person storing, using, or
otherwise consuming in this state property purchased from a retailer shall keep
such records, receipts, invoices, and other pertinent papers in such form as
the Tax Commissioner may reasonably require.
(b) Every such seller, retailer, or person shall keep such records for not
less than three years from the making of such records unless the Tax
Commissioner in writing sooner authorized their destruction.
(4) The Tax Commissioner or any person authorized in writing by him or her
may examine the books, papers, records, and equipment of any person selling
property and any person liable for the use tax and may investigate the
character of the business of the person in order to verify the accuracy of any
return made or, if no return is made by the person, to ascertain and determine
the amount required to be paid. In the examination of any person selling
property or of any person liable for the use tax, an inquiry shall be made as
to the accuracy of the reporting of city and county sales and use taxes for
which the person is liable under the Local Option Revenue Act or sections
13-319, 13-324, 13-2813, and 77-6403 and the accuracy of the allocation made
between the various counties, cities, villages, and municipal counties of the
-22-

LB650 LB650
2025 2025
tax due. The Tax Commissioner may make or cause to be made copies of resale or
exemption certificates and may pay a reasonable amount to the person having
custody of the records for providing such copies.
(5) The taxpayer shall have the right to keep or store his or her records
at a point outside this state and shall make his or her records available to
the Tax Commissioner at all times.
(6) In administration of the use tax, the Tax Commissioner may require the
filing of reports by any person or class of persons having in his, her, or
their possession or custody information relating to sales of property, the
storage, use, or other consumption of which is subject to the tax. The report
shall be filed when the Tax Commissioner requires and shall set forth the names
and addresses of purchasers of the property, the sales price of the property,
the date of sale, and such other information as the Tax Commissioner may
require.
(7) It shall be a Class I misdemeanor for the Tax Commissioner or any
official or employee of the Tax Commissioner, the State Treasurer, or the
Department of Administrative Services to make known in any manner whatever the
business affairs, operations, or information obtained by an investigation of
records and activities of any retailer or any other person visited or examined
in the discharge of official duty or the amount or source of income, profits,
losses, expenditures, or any particular thereof, set forth or disclosed in any
return, or to permit any return or copy thereof, or any book containing any
abstract or particulars thereof to be seen or examined by any person not
connected with the Tax Commissioner. Nothing in this section shall be construed
to prohibit (a) the delivery to a taxpayer, his or her duly authorized
representative, or his or her successors, receivers, trustees, executors,
administrators, assignees, or guarantors, if directly interested, of a
certified copy of any return or report in connection with his or her tax, (b)
the publication of statistics so classified as to prevent the identification of
particular reports or returns and the items thereof, (c) the inspection by the
Attorney General, other legal representative of the state, or county attorney
of the reports or returns of any taxpayer when either (i) information on the
reports or returns is considered by the Attorney General to be relevant to any
action or proceeding instituted by the taxpayer or against whom an action or
proceeding is being considered or has been commenced by any state agency or the
county or (ii) the taxpayer has instituted an action to review the tax based
thereon or an action or proceeding against the taxpayer for collection of tax
or failure to comply with the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 is being considered
or has been commenced, (d) the furnishing of any information to the United
States Government or to states allowing similar privileges to the Tax
Commissioner, (e) the disclosure of information and records to a collection
agency contracting with the Tax Commissioner pursuant to sections 77-377.01 to
77-377.04, (f) the disclosure to another party to a transaction of information
and records concerning the transaction between the taxpayer and the other
party, (g) the disclosure of information pursuant to section 77-27,195,
77-5731, 77-6837, 77-6839, or 77-6928, or (h) the disclosure of information to
the Department of Labor necessary for the administration of the Employment
Security Law, the Contractor Registration Act, or the Employee Classification
Act.
(8) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (7) of this section, the
Tax Commissioner may permit the Postal Inspector of the United States Postal
Service or his or her delegates to inspect the reports or returns of any person
filed pursuant to the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 when information on the
reports or returns is relevant to any action or proceeding instituted or being
considered by the United States Postal Service against such person for the
fraudulent use of the mails to carry and deliver false and fraudulent tax
returns to the Tax Commissioner with the intent to defraud the State of
Nebraska or to evade the payment of Nebraska state taxes.
(9) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (7) of this section, the
Tax Commissioner may permit other tax officials of this state to inspect the
tax returns, reports, and applications filed under sections 77-2701.04 to
77-2713, but such inspection shall be permitted only for purposes of enforcing
a tax law and only to the extent and under the conditions prescribed by the
rules and regulations of the Tax Commissioner.
(10) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (7) of this section, the
Tax Commissioner may, upon request, provide the county board of any county
which has exercised the authority granted by section 81-3716 with a list of the
names and addresses of the hotels located within the county for which lodging
sales tax returns have been filed or for which lodging sales taxes have been
remitted for the county's County Visitors Promotion Fund under the Nebraska
Visitors Development Act.
The information provided by the Tax Commissioner shall indicate only the
names and addresses of the hotels located within the requesting county for
which lodging sales tax returns have been filed for a specified period and the
fact that lodging sales taxes remitted by or on behalf of the hotel have
constituted a portion of the total sum remitted by the state to the county for
a specified period under the provisions of the Nebraska Visitors Development
Act. No additional information shall be revealed.
(11)(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (7) of this section,
the Tax Commissioner shall, upon written request by the Auditor of Public
Accounts or the office of Legislative Audit, make tax returns and tax return
information open to inspection by or disclosure to the Auditor of Public
Accounts or employees of the office of Legislative Audit for the purpose of and
-23-

LB650 LB650
2025 2025
to the extent necessary in making an audit of the Department of Revenue
pursuant to section 50-1205 or 84-304 or subsection (14) of this section.
Confidential tax returns and tax return information shall be audited only upon
the premises of the Department of Revenue. All audit work papers pertaining to
the audit of the Department of Revenue shall be stored in a secure place in the
Department of Revenue.
(b) No employee of the Auditor of Public Accounts or the office of
Legislative Audit shall disclose to any person, other than another Auditor of
Public Accounts or office employee whose official duties require such
disclosure, any return or return information described in the Nebraska Revenue
Act of 1967 in a form which can be associated with or otherwise identify,
directly or indirectly, a particular taxpayer.
(c) Any person who violates the provisions of this subsection shall be
guilty of a Class I misdemeanor. For purposes of this subsection, employee
includes a former Auditor of Public Accounts or office of Legislative Audit
employee.
(12) For purposes of this subsection and subsections (11) and (14) of this
section:
(a) Disclosure means the making known to any person in any manner a tax
return or return information;
(b) Return information means:
(i) A taxpayer's identification number and (A) the nature, source, or
amount of his or her income, payments, receipts, deductions, exemptions,
credits, assets, liabilities, net worth, tax liability, tax withheld,
deficiencies, over assessments, or tax payments, whether the taxpayer's return
was, is being, or will be examined or subject to other investigation or
processing or (B) any other data received by, recorded by, prepared by,
furnished to, or collected by the Tax Commissioner with respect to a return or
the determination of the existence or possible existence of liability or the
amount of liability of any person for any tax, penalty, interest, fine,
forfeiture, or other imposition or offense; and
(ii) Any part of any written determination or any background file document
relating to such written determination; and
(c) Tax return or return means any tax or information return or claim for
refund required by, provided for, or permitted under sections 77-2701 to
77-2713 which is filed with the Tax Commissioner by, on behalf of, or with
respect to any person and any amendment or supplement thereto, including
supporting schedules, attachments, or lists which are supplemental to or part
of the filed return.
(13) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (7) of this section, the
Tax Commissioner shall, upon request, provide any municipality which has
adopted the local option sales tax under the Local Option Revenue Act with a
list of the names and addresses of the retailers which have collected the local
option sales tax for the municipality. The request may be made annually and
shall be submitted to the Tax Commissioner on or before June 30 of each year.
The information provided by the Tax Commissioner shall indicate only the names
and addresses of the retailers. The Tax Commissioner may provide additional
information to a municipality so long as the information does not include any
data detailing the specific revenue, expenses, or operations of any particular
business.
(14)(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (7) of this section,
the Tax Commissioner shall, upon written request, provide an individual
certified under subdivision (b) of this subsection representing a municipality
which has adopted the local option sales and use tax under the Local Option
Revenue Act with confidential sales and use tax returns and sales and use tax
return information regarding taxpayers that possess a sales tax permit and the
amounts remitted by such permitholders at locations within the boundaries of
the requesting municipality or with confidential business use tax returns and
business use tax return information regarding taxpayers that file a Nebraska
and Local Business Use Tax Return and the amounts remitted by such taxpayers at
locations within the boundaries of the requesting municipality. Any written
request pursuant to this subsection shall provide the Department of Revenue
with no less than ten business days to prepare the sales and use tax returns
and sales and use tax return information requested. The individual certified
under subdivision (b) of this subsection shall review such returns and return
information only upon the premises of the department, except that such
limitation shall not apply if the certifying municipality has an agreement in
effect under the Nebraska Advantage Transformational Tourism and Redevelopment
Act. In such case, the individual certified under subdivision (b) of this
subsection may request that copies of such returns and return information be
sent to him or her by electronic transmission, secured in a manner as
determined by the Tax Commissioner.
(b) Each municipality that seeks to request information under subdivision
(a) of this subsection shall certify to the Department of Revenue one
individual who is authorized by such municipality to make such request and
review the documents described in subdivision (a) of this subsection. The
individual may be a municipal employee or an individual who contracts with the
requesting municipality to provide financial, accounting, or other
administrative services.
(c) If upon review of the documents described in subdivision (a) of this
subsection the individual certified by a municipality pursuant to subdivision
(b) of this subsection identifies a suspected irregularity or discrepancy, such
individual may provide notification of the suspected irregularity or
-24-

LB650 LB650
2025 2025
discrepancy to the Auditor of Public Accounts who may conduct an audit as
provided in subsection (11) of this section.
(d) An (c) No individual certified by a municipality pursuant to
subdivision (b) of this subsection shall not disclose to any person any
information obtained pursuant to a review under this subsection other than for
the purposes described in this subsection. An individual certified by a
municipality pursuant to subdivision (b) of this subsection shall remain
subject to this subsection after he or she (i) is no longer certified or (ii)
is no longer in the employment of or under contract with the certifying
municipality.
(e) (d) Any person who violates the provisions of this subsection shall be
guilty of a Class I misdemeanor.
(f) (e) The Department of Revenue shall not be held liable by any person
for an impermissible disclosure by a municipality or any agent or employee
thereof of any information obtained pursuant to a review under this subsection.
(15) In all proceedings under the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967, the Tax
Commissioner may act for and on behalf of the people of the State of Nebraska.
The Tax Commissioner in his or her discretion may waive all or part of any
penalties provided by the provisions of such act or interest on delinquent
taxes specified in section 45-104.02, as such rate may from time to time be
adjusted.
(16)(a) The purpose of this subsection is to set forth the state's policy
for the protection of the confidentiality rights of all participants in the
system operated pursuant to the streamlined sales and use tax agreement and of
the privacy interests of consumers who deal with model 1 sellers.
(b) For purposes of this subsection:
(i) Anonymous data means information that does not identify a person;
(ii) Confidential taxpayer information means all information that is
protected under a member state's laws, regulations, and privileges; and
(iii) Personally identifiable information means information that
identifies a person.
(c) The state agrees that a fundamental precept for model 1 sellers is to
preserve the privacy of consumers by protecting their anonymity. With very
limited exceptions, a certified service provider shall perform its tax
calculation, remittance, and reporting functions without retaining the
personally identifiable information of consumers.
(d) The governing board of the member states in the streamlined sales and
use tax agreement may certify a certified service provider only if that
certified service provider certifies that:
(i) Its system has been designed and tested to ensure that the fundamental
precept of anonymity is respected;
(ii) Personally identifiable information is only used and retained to the
extent necessary for the administration of model 1 with respect to exempt
purchasers;
(iii) It provides consumers clear and conspicuous notice of its
information practices, including what information it collects, how it collects
the information, how it uses the information, how long, if at all, it retains
the information, and whether it discloses the information to member states.
Such notice shall be satisfied by a written privacy policy statement accessible
by the public on the website of the certified service provider;
(iv) Its collection, use, and retention of personally identifiable
information is limited to that required by the member states to ensure the
validity of exemptions from taxation that are claimed by reason of a consumer's
status or the intended use of the goods or services purchased; and
(v) It provides adequate technical, physical, and administrative
safeguards so as to protect personally identifiable information from
unauthorized access and disclosure.
(e) The state shall provide public notification to consumers, including
exempt purchasers, of the state's practices relating to the collection, use,
and retention of personally identifiable information.
(f) When any personally identifiable information that has been collected
and retained is no longer required for the purposes set forth in subdivision
(16)(d)(iv) of this section, such information shall no longer be retained by
the member states.
(g) When personally identifiable information regarding an individual is
retained by or on behalf of the state, it shall provide reasonable access by
such individual to his or her own information in the state's possession and a
right to correct any inaccurately recorded information.
(h) If anyone other than a member state, or a person authorized by that
state's law or the agreement, seeks to discover personally identifiable
information, the state from whom the information is sought should make a
reasonable and timely effort to notify the individual of such request.
(i) This privacy policy is subject to enforcement by the Attorney General.
(j) All other laws and regulations regarding the collection, use, and
maintenance of confidential taxpayer information remain fully applicable and
binding. Without limitation, this subsection does not enlarge or limit the
state's authority to:
(i) Conduct audits or other reviews as provided under the agreement and
state law;
(ii) Provide records pursuant to the federal Freedom of Information Act,
disclosure laws with governmental agencies, or other regulations;
(iii) Prevent, consistent with state law, disclosure of confidential
taxpayer information;
-25-

LB650 LB650
2025 2025
(iv) Prevent, consistent with federal law, disclosure or misuse of federal
return information obtained under a disclosure agreement with the Internal
Revenue Service; and
(v) Collect, disclose, disseminate, or otherwise use anonymous data for
governmental purposes.
Sec. 41. Section 77-2715.07, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
77-2715.07 (1) There shall be allowed to qualified resident individuals as
a nonrefundable credit against the income tax imposed by the Nebraska Revenue
Act of 1967:
(a) A credit equal to the federal credit allowed under section 22 of the
Internal Revenue Code; and
(b) A credit for taxes paid to another state as provided in section
77-2730.
(2) There shall be allowed to qualified resident individuals against the
income tax imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967:
(a) For returns filed reporting federal adjusted gross incomes of greater
than twenty-nine thousand dollars, a nonrefundable credit equal to twenty-five
percent of the federal credit allowed under section 21 of the Internal Revenue
Code of 1986, as amended, except that for taxable years beginning or deemed to
begin on or after January 1, 2015, such nonrefundable credit shall be allowed
only if the individual would have received the federal credit allowed under
section 21 of the code after adding back in any carryforward of a net operating
loss that was deducted pursuant to such section in determining eligibility for
the federal credit;
(b) For returns filed reporting federal adjusted gross income of twenty-
nine thousand dollars or less, a refundable credit equal to a percentage of the
federal credit allowable under section 21 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986,
as amended, whether or not the federal credit was limited by the federal tax
liability. The percentage of the federal credit shall be one hundred percent
for incomes not greater than twenty-two thousand dollars, and the percentage
shall be reduced by ten percent for each one thousand dollars, or fraction
thereof, by which the reported federal adjusted gross income exceeds twenty-two
thousand dollars, except that for taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on
or after January 1, 2015, such refundable credit shall be allowed only if the
individual would have received the federal credit allowed under section 21 of
the code after adding back in any carryforward of a net operating loss that was
deducted pursuant to such section in determining eligibility for the federal
credit;
(c) A refundable credit as provided in section 77-5209.01 for individuals
who qualify for an income tax credit as a qualified beginning farmer or
livestock producer under the Beginning Farmer Tax Credit Act for all taxable
years beginning or deemed to begin on or after January 1, 2006, under the
Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended;
(d) A refundable credit for individuals who qualify for an income tax
credit under the Angel Investment Tax Credit Act, the Nebraska Advantage
Microenterprise Tax Credit Act, the Nebraska Advantage Research and Development
Act, the Reverse Osmosis System Tax Credit Act, or the Volunteer Emergency
Responders Incentive Act; and
(e) A refundable credit equal to ten percent of the federal credit allowed
under section 32 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, except that
for taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after January 1, 2015,
such refundable credit shall be allowed only if the individual would have
received the federal credit allowed under section 32 of the code after adding
back in any carryforward of a net operating loss that was deducted pursuant to
such section in determining eligibility for the federal credit.
(3) There shall be allowed to all individuals as a nonrefundable credit
against the income tax imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967:
(a) A credit for personal exemptions allowed under section 77-2716.01;
(b) A credit for (i) contributions to programs or projects certified for
tax credit status as provided in the Creating High Impact Economic Futures Act
and (ii) contributions to certified community betterment programs as provided
in the Community Development Assistance Act. Each partner, each shareholder of
an electing subchapter S corporation, each beneficiary of an estate or trust,
or each member of a limited liability company shall report his or her share of
the credit in the same manner and proportion as he or she reports the
partnership, subchapter S corporation, estate, trust, or limited liability
company income;
(c) A credit for investment in a biodiesel facility as provided in section
77-27,236;
(d) A credit as provided in the New Markets Job Growth Investment Act;
(e) A credit as provided in the Nebraska Job Creation and Mainstreet
Revitalization Act;
(f) A credit to employers as provided in sections 77-27,238 and 77-27,240;
(g) A credit as provided in the Affordable Housing Tax Credit Act;
(h) A credit to grocery store retailers, restaurants, and agricultural
producers as provided in section 77-27,241;
(i) A credit as provided in the Sustainable Aviation Fuel Tax Credit Act;
(j) A credit as provided in the Nebraska Shortline Rail Modernization Act;
(k) A credit as provided in the Nebraska Pregnancy Help Act; and
(l) A credit as provided in the Caregiver Tax Credit Act.
(4) There shall be allowed as a credit against the income tax imposed by
the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967:
-26-

LB650 LB650
2025 2025
(a) A credit to all resident estates and trusts for taxes paid to another
state as provided in section 77-2730;
(b) A credit to all estates and trusts for (i) contributions to programs
or projects certified for tax credit status as provided in the Creating High
Impact Economic Futures Act and (ii) contributions to certified community
betterment programs as provided in the Community Development Assistance Act;
and
(c) A refundable credit for individuals who qualify for an income tax
credit as an owner of agricultural assets under the Beginning Farmer Tax Credit
Act for all taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after January 1,
2009, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended. The credit allowed
for each partner, shareholder, member, or beneficiary of a partnership,
corporation, limited liability company, or estate or trust qualifying for an
income tax credit as an owner of agricultural assets under the Beginning Farmer
Tax Credit Act shall be equal to the partner's, shareholder's, member's, or
beneficiary's portion of the amount of tax credit distributed pursuant to
subsection (6) of section 77-5211.
(5)(a) For all taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2007, and
before January 1, 2009, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended,
there shall be allowed to each partner, shareholder, member, or beneficiary of
a partnership, subchapter S corporation, limited liability company, or estate
or trust a nonrefundable credit against the income tax imposed by the Nebraska
Revenue Act of 1967 equal to fifty percent of the partner's, shareholder's,
member's, or beneficiary's portion of the amount of franchise tax paid to the
state under sections 77-3801 to 77-3807 by a financial institution.
(b) For all taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2009, under the
Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, there shall be allowed to each
partner, shareholder, member, or beneficiary of a partnership, subchapter S
corporation, limited liability company, or estate or trust a nonrefundable
credit against the income tax imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 equal
to the partner's, shareholder's, member's, or beneficiary's portion of the
amount of franchise tax paid to the state under sections 77-3801 to 77-3807 by
a financial institution.
(c) Each partner, shareholder, member, or beneficiary shall report his or
her share of the credit in the same manner and proportion as he or she reports
the partnership, subchapter S corporation, limited liability company, or estate
or trust income. If any partner, shareholder, member, or beneficiary cannot
fully utilize the credit for that year, the credit may not be carried forward
or back.
(6) There shall be allowed to all individuals nonrefundable credits
against the income tax imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 as provided
in section 77-3604 and refundable credits against the income tax imposed by the
Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 as provided in section 77-3605.
(7)(a) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after January
1, 2020, and before January 1, 2026, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986,
as amended, a nonrefundable credit against the income tax imposed by the
Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 in the amount of five thousand dollars shall be
allowed to any individual who purchases a residence during the taxable year if
such residence:
(i) Is located within an area that has been declared an extremely blighted
area under section 18-2101.02;
(ii) Is the individual's primary residence; and
(iii) Was not purchased from a family member of the individual or a family
member of the individual's spouse.
(b) The credit provided in this subsection shall be claimed for the
taxable year in which the residence is purchased. If the individual cannot
fully utilize the credit for such year, the credit may be carried forward to
subsequent taxable years until fully utilized.
(c) No more than one credit may be claimed under this subsection with
respect to a single residence.
(d) The credit provided in this subsection shall be subject to recapture
by the Department of Revenue if the individual claiming the credit sells or
otherwise transfers the residence or quits using the residence as his or her
primary residence within five years after the end of the taxable year in which
the credit was claimed.
(e) For purposes of this subsection, family member means an individual's
spouse, child, parent, brother, sister, grandchild, or grandparent, whether by
blood, marriage, or adoption.
(8) There shall be allowed to all individuals refundable credits against
the income tax imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 as provided in the
Cast and Crew Nebraska Act, the Nebraska Biodiesel Tax Credit Act, the Nebraska
Higher Blend Tax Credit Act, the Nebraska Property Tax Incentive Act, the
Relocation Incentive Act, and the Renewable Chemical Production Tax Credit Act.
(9)(a) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after January
1, 2022, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, a refundable
credit against the income tax imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 shall
be allowed to the parent of a stillborn child if:
(i) A fetal death certificate is filed pursuant to subsection (1) of
section 71-606 for such child;
(ii) Such child had advanced to at least the twentieth week of gestation;
and
(iii) Such child would have been a dependent of the individual claiming
the credit.
-27-

LB650 LB650
2025 2025
(b) The amount of the credit shall be two thousand dollars.
(c) The credit shall be allowed for the taxable year in which the
stillbirth occurred.
(10) There shall be allowed to all individuals refundable credits against
the income tax imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 as provided in
section 77-7203 and nonrefundable credits against the income tax imposed by the
Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 as provided in section 77-7204.
(11) There shall be allowed to all individuals refundable credits against
the income tax imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 as provided in
section 77-3157 and nonrefundable credits against the income tax imposed by the
Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 as provided in sections 77-3156, 77-3158, and
77-3159.
Sec. 42. Section 77-2734.03, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
77-2734.03 (1)(a) For taxable years commencing prior to January 1, 1997,
any (i) insurer paying a tax on premiums and assessments pursuant to section
77-908 or 81-523, (ii) electric cooperative organized under the Joint Public
Power Authority Act, or (iii) credit union shall be credited, in the
computation of the tax due under the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967, with the
amount paid during the taxable year as taxes on such premiums and assessments
and taxes in lieu of intangible tax.
(b) For taxable years commencing on or after January 1, 1997, any insurer
paying a tax on premiums and assessments pursuant to section 77-908 or 81-523,
any electric cooperative organized under the Joint Public Power Authority Act,
or any credit union shall be credited, in the computation of the tax due under
the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967, with the amount paid during the taxable year
as (i) taxes on such premiums and assessments included as Nebraska premiums and
assessments under section 77-2734.05 and (ii) taxes in lieu of intangible tax.
(c) For taxable years commencing or deemed to commence prior to, on, or
after January 1, 1998, any insurer paying a tax on premiums and assessments
pursuant to section 77-908 or 81-523 shall be credited, in the computation of
the tax due under the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967, with the amount paid during
the taxable year as assessments allowed as an offset against premium and
related retaliatory tax liability pursuant to section 44-4233.
(2) There shall be allowed to corporate taxpayers a tax credit for (a)
contributions to programs or projects certified for tax credit status as
provided in the Creating High Impact Economic Futures Act and (b) contributions
to certified community betterment programs as provided in the Community
Development Assistance Act.
(3) There shall be allowed to corporate taxpayers a refundable income tax
credit under the Beginning Farmer Tax Credit Act for all taxable years
beginning or deemed to begin on or after January 1, 2001, under the Internal
Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.
(4) The changes made to this section by Laws 2004, LB 983, apply to motor
fuels purchased during any tax year ending or deemed to end on or after January
1, 2005, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.
(5) There shall be allowed to corporate taxpayers refundable income tax
credits under the Nebraska Advantage Microenterprise Tax Credit Act, the Cast
and Crew Nebraska Act, the Nebraska Advantage Research and Development Act, the
Nebraska Biodiesel Tax Credit Act, the Nebraska Higher Blend Tax Credit Act,
the Nebraska Property Tax Incentive Act, the Relocation Incentive Act, and the
Renewable Chemical Production Tax Credit Act.
(6) There shall be allowed to corporate taxpayers a nonrefundable income
tax credit for investment in a biodiesel facility as provided in section
77-27,236.
(7) There shall be allowed to corporate taxpayers a nonrefundable income
tax credit as provided in the Nebraska Job Creation and Mainstreet
Revitalization Act, the New Markets Job Growth Investment Act, the School
Readiness Tax Credit Act, the Child Care Tax Credit Act, the Affordable Housing
Tax Credit Act, the Sustainable Aviation Fuel Tax Credit Act, the Nebraska
Shortline Rail Modernization Act, the Nebraska Pregnancy Help Act, the
Individuals with Intellectual and Developmental Disabilities Support Act, and
sections 77-27,238, 77-27,240, and 77-27,241.
Sec. 43. Section 77-27,187.02, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-27,187.02 (1) To earn the incentives set forth in the Nebraska
Advantage Rural Development Act, the taxpayer shall file an application for an
agreement with the Tax Commissioner. There shall be no new applications for
incentives filed under this section after December 31, 2027.
(2) The application shall contain:
(a) A written statement describing the full expected employment or type of
livestock production and the investment amount for a qualified business, as
described in section 77-27,189, in this state;
(b) Sufficient documents, plans, and specifications as required by the Tax
Commissioner to support the plan and to define a project; and
(c) An application fee of (i) one hundred dollars for an investment amount
of less than twenty-five thousand dollars, (ii) two hundred fifty dollars for
an investment amount of at least twenty-five thousand dollars but less than
fifty thousand dollars, and (iii) five hundred dollars for an investment amount
of fifty thousand dollars or more. The fee shall be remitted to the State
Treasurer for credit to the Nebraska Incentives Fund. The application and all
supporting information shall be confidential except for the name of the
taxpayer, the location of the project, and the amounts of increased employment
-28-

LB650 LB650
2025 2025
or investment.
(3)(a) The Tax Commissioner shall approve the application and authorize
the total amount of credits expected to be earned as a result of the project if
he or she is satisfied that the plan in the application defines a project that
(i) meets the requirements established in section 77-27,188 and such
requirements will be reached within the required time period and (ii) for
projects other than livestock modernization or expansion projects, is located
in an eligible county, city, or village.
(b) For applications filed in calendar year 2016 and each year thereafter,
the Tax Commissioner shall not approve further applications from applicants
described in subsection (1) of section 77-27,188 once the expected credits from
approved projects in this category total: For calendar years 2016 through 2022,
one million dollars; and for calendar years year 2023 through 2025 and each
calendar year thereafter, two million dollars; and for calendar year 2026 and
each calendar year thereafter, one million dollars. For applications filed in
calendar year 2016 and each year thereafter, the Tax Commissioner shall not
approve further applications from applicants described in subsection (2) of
section 77-27,188 once the expected credits from approved projects in this
category total: For calendar year 2016, five hundred thousand dollars; for
calendar years 2017 and 2018, seven hundred fifty thousand dollars; for
calendar years 2019, 2020, and 2021, one million dollars; and for calendar
years year 2022 through 2024 and each calendar year thereafter, ten million
dollars; for calendar year 2025, seven million five hundred thousand dollars;
and for calendar year 2026 and each calendar year thereafter, one million
dollars. Four hundred dollars of the application fee shall be refunded to the
applicant if the application is not approved because the expected credits from
approved projects exceed such amounts.
(c) Applications for benefits shall be considered separately and in the
order in which they are received for the categories represented by subsections
(1) and (2) of section 77-27,188.
(d) Applications shall be filed by November 1 and shall be complete by
December 1 of each calendar year. Any application that is filed after November
1 or that is not complete on December 1 shall be considered to be filed during
the following calendar year.
(4) After approval, the taxpayer and the Tax Commissioner shall enter into
a written agreement. The taxpayer shall agree to complete the project, and the
Tax Commissioner, on behalf of the State of Nebraska, shall designate the
approved plans of the taxpayer as a project and, in consideration of the
taxpayer's agreement, agree to allow the taxpayer to use the incentives
contained in the Nebraska Advantage Rural Development Act up to the total
amount that were authorized by the Tax Commissioner at the time of approval.
The application, and all supporting documentation, to the extent approved,
shall be considered a part of the agreement. The agreement shall state:
(a) The levels of employment and investment required by the act for the
project;
(b) The time period under the act in which the required level must be met;
(c) The documentation the taxpayer will need to supply when claiming an
incentive under the act;
(d) The date the application was filed; and
(e) The maximum amount of credits authorized.
Sec. 44. Section 77-27,188, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
77-27,188 (1) A refundable credit against the taxes imposed by the
Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 shall be allowed to any taxpayer who has an
approved application pursuant to the Nebraska Advantage Rural Development Act,
who is engaged in a qualified business as described in section 77-27,189, and
who after January 1, 2006:
(a)(i) Increases employment by two new equivalent employees and makes an
increased investment of at least one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars prior
to the end of the first taxable year after the year in which the application
was submitted in (A) any county in this state with a population of fewer than
fifteen thousand inhabitants, according to the most recent federal decennial
census, (B) any village in this state, or (C) any area within the corporate
limits of a city of the metropolitan class consisting of one or more contiguous
census tracts, as determined by the most recent federal decennial census, which
contain a percentage of persons below the poverty line of greater than thirty
percent, and all census tracts contiguous to such tract or tracts; or
(ii) Increases employment by five new equivalent employees and makes an
increased investment of at least two hundred fifty thousand dollars prior to
the end of the first taxable year after the year in which the application was
submitted in any county in this state with a population of less than twenty-
five thousand inhabitants, according to the most recent federal decennial
census, or any city of the second class; and
(b) Pays a minimum qualifying wage of eight dollars and twenty-five cents
per hour to the new equivalent employees for which tax credits are sought under
the Nebraska Advantage Rural Development Act. The Department of Revenue shall
adjust the minimum qualifying wages required for applications filed after
January 1, 2004, and each January 1 thereafter, as follows: The current rural
Nebraska average weekly wage shall be divided by the rural Nebraska average
weekly wage for 2003; and the result shall be multiplied by the eight dollars
and twenty-five cents minimum qualifying wage for 2003 and rounded to the
nearest one cent. The amount of increase or decrease in the minimum qualifying
wages for any year shall be the cumulative change in the rural Nebraska average
-29-

LB650 LB650
2025 2025
weekly wage since 2003. For purposes of this subsection, rural Nebraska average
weekly wage means the most recent average weekly wage paid by all employers in
all counties with a population of less than twenty-five thousand inhabitants as
reported by October 1 by the Department of Labor.
For purposes of this section, a teleworker working in Nebraska from his or
her residence for a taxpayer shall be considered an employee of the taxpayer,
and property of the taxpayer provided to the teleworker working in Nebraska
from his or her residence shall be considered an investment. Teleworker
includes an individual working on a per-item basis and an independent
contractor working for the taxpayer so long as the taxpayer withholds Nebraska
income tax from wages or other payments made to such teleworker. For purposes
of calculating the number of new equivalent employees when the teleworkers are
paid on a per-item basis or are independent contractors, the total wages or
payments made to all such new employees during the year shall be divided by the
qualifying wage as determined in subdivision (b) of this subsection, with the
result divided by two thousand eighty hours.
(2) A refundable credit against the taxes imposed by the Nebraska Revenue
Act of 1967 shall be allowed to any taxpayer who (a) has an approved
application pursuant to the Nebraska Advantage Rural Development Act, (b) is
engaged in livestock production, and (c) invests at least (i) fifty thousand
dollars for livestock modernization or expansion for applications filed before
January 1, 2024, (ii) or at least ten thousand dollars for livestock
modernization or expansion for applications filed on or after January 1, 2024,
and before January 1, 2026, or (iii) fifty thousand dollars for livestock
modernization or expansion for applications filed on or after January 1, 2026.
(3) The amount of the credit allowed under subsection (1) of this section
shall be three thousand dollars for each new equivalent employee and two
thousand seven hundred fifty dollars for each fifty thousand dollars of
increased investment. For applications filed before January 1, 2016, the amount
of the credit allowed under subsection (2) of this section shall be ten percent
of the investment, not to exceed a credit of thirty thousand dollars. For
applications filed on or after January 1, 2016, and before April 20, 2022, the
amount of the credit allowed under subsection (2) of this section shall be ten
percent of the investment, not to exceed a credit of one hundred fifty thousand
dollars per application. For applications filed on or after April 20, 2022, and
before January 1, 2026, the amount of the credit allowed under subsection (2)
of this section shall be ten percent of the investment, not to exceed a credit
of five hundred thousand dollars per application. For applications filed on or
after January 1, 2026, the amount of the credit allowed under subsection (2) of
this section shall be ten percent of the investment, not to exceed a credit of
one hundred fifty thousand dollars per application. For each application, a
taxpayer engaged in livestock production may qualify for a credit under either
subsection (1) or (2) of this section, but cannot qualify for more than one
credit per application.
(4) An employee of a qualified employee leasing company shall be
considered to be an employee of the client-lessee for purposes of this section
if the employee performs services for the client-lessee. A qualified employee
leasing company shall provide the Department of Revenue access to the records
of employees leased to the client-lessee.
(5) The credit shall not exceed the amounts set out in the application and
approved by the Tax Commissioner.
(6)(a) If a taxpayer who receives tax credits creates fewer jobs or less
investment than required in the project agreement, the taxpayer shall repay the
tax credits as provided in this subsection.
(b) If less than seventy-five percent of the required jobs in the project
agreement are created, one hundred percent of the job creation tax credits
shall be repaid. If seventy-five percent or more of the required jobs in the
project agreement are created, no repayment of the job creation tax credits is
necessary.
(c) If less than seventy-five percent of the required investment in the
project agreement is created, one hundred percent of the investment tax credits
shall be repaid. If seventy-five percent or more of the required investment in
the project agreement is created, no repayment of the investment tax credits is
necessary.
(7) For taxpayers who submitted applications for benefits under the
Nebraska Advantage Rural Development Act before January 1, 2006, subsection (1)
of this section, as such subsection existed immediately prior to such date,
shall continue to apply to such taxpayers. The changes made by Laws 2005, LB
312, shall not preclude a taxpayer from receiving the tax incentives earned
prior to January 1, 2006.
Sec. 45. Section 77-27,241, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
77-27,241 (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Agricultural producer means an individual or entity whose income is
primarily attributable to crop or livestock production in the State of
Nebraska;
(b) Department means the Department of Revenue;
(c) Food bank means an organization in this state that:
(i) Is exempt from federal income taxation under section 501(c)(3) of the
Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended; and
(ii) Distributes food in ten or more counties in Nebraska and qualifies
for the Emergency Food Assistance Program administered by the United States
Department of Agriculture;
-30-

LB650 LB650
2025 2025
(d) Food pantry means an organization in this state that:
(i) Is exempt from federal income taxation under section 501(c)(3) of the
Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended; and
(ii) Distributes emergency food supplies to low-income individuals in this
state who would otherwise not have access to such food supplies;
(e) Food rescue means an organization in this state that:
(i) Is exempt from federal income taxation under section 501(c)(3) of the
Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended; and
(ii) Accepts donations of food and delivers such food to food banks or
food pantries so that such food may be distributed to low-income individuals in
this state;
(f) Grocery store retailer means a retailer located in this state that is
primarily engaged in business activities classified as code 445110 under the
North American Industry Classification System;
(g) Qualifying agricultural food donation means a donation made by an
agricultural producer to a food bank, food pantry, or food rescue of fresh or
frozen fruits, vegetables, eggs, dairy products, or meat products grown or
produced in the State of Nebraska which meets all applicable quality and
labeling standards, along with any other applicable requirements of the food
bank, food pantry, or food rescue to which the qualifying agricultural food
donation is made; and
(h) Restaurant means a business located in this state that is primarily
engaged in business activities classified as code 722511, 722513, 722514, or
722515 under the North American Industry Classification System.
(2) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after January 1,
2025, and before January 1, 2026, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as
amended, a credit against the income tax imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of
1967 shall be allowed to:
(a) Any grocery store retailer or restaurant that donates food to a food
bank, food pantry, or food rescue during the taxable year; and
(b) Any agricultural producer that makes a qualifying agricultural food
donation to a food bank, food pantry, or food rescue during the taxable year.
(3) Subject to subsection (7) of this section, the credit provided in this
section shall be a nonrefundable credit in an amount equal to fifty percent of
the value of the food donations or qualifying agricultural food donations made
during the taxable year, not to exceed two thousand five hundred dollars. Any
amount of the credit that the taxpayer is prohibited from claiming in a taxable
year may be carried forward to any of the three subsequent taxable years.
(4) For purposes of this section, food donated by a grocery store retailer
or restaurant shall be valued at its wholesale value. A qualifying agricultural
food donation shall be valued at the prevailing market value of the product at
the time of donation, plus the direct cost incurred by the agricultural
producer for processing the product.
(5) To receive a credit under this section, a taxpayer shall submit an
application to the department in a form and manner prescribed by the
department. The application shall include the amount of food donated during the
taxable year and any other information required by the department.
(6) If the department determines that an application is complete and that
the taxpayer qualifies for credits, the department shall approve the
application within the limits set forth in this section and shall certify the
amount of credits approved to the taxpayer.
(7) The department may approve up to five hundred thousand dollars of
credits in fiscal year 2025-26 and each fiscal year thereafter. If the amount
of credits requested by qualified taxpayers in any year exceeds such limit, the
department shall allocate credits proportionally based on the amounts requested
so that the limit is not exceeded.
(8) A taxpayer shall claim the credit by attaching the tax credit
certification received from the department under subsection (6) of this section
to the taxpayer's tax return.
(9) Any amount relating to such food donations or qualifying agricultural
food donations that was deducted as a charitable contribution on the taxpayer's
federal income tax return must be added back in the determination of Nebraska
taxable income before the credit provided in this section may be claimed.
(10) No credit granted under this section shall be transferred, sold, or
assigned. No taxpayer shall be eligible to receive a credit under this section
if such taxpayer employs persons who are not authorized to work in the United
States under federal law. No taxpayer shall be able to claim more than one
credit under this section for a single donation.
(11) A food bank, food pantry, or food rescue may accept or reject any
food donated under this section for any reason. Any food that is rejected shall
not qualify for a credit under this section.
(12) The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to
carry out this section.
Sec. 46. Section 77-3110, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
77-3110 The department may approve tax credits under the Relocation
Incentive Act each year until the total amount of credits approved for the year
reaches one five million dollars.
Sec. 47. Section 77-3120, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
77-3120 The annual limit on the total amount of tax credits allowed (1)
for calendar year years 2025 and 2026 shall be nine hundred thousand dollars
per year with a total of three hundred thousand dollars per year for each
-31-

LB650 LB650
2025 2025
congressional district and (2) for calendar year 2027 and each calendar year
thereafter shall be three million dollars per year with a total of one million
dollars per year for each congressional district. Once credits have reached the
annual limit for any calendar year, no additional credits shall be allowed for
such calendar year. The maximum amount of credits per program or project shall
not exceed one hundred fifty thousand dollars per year for the first
congressional district and one hundred fifty thousand dollars per year for the
third congressional district. Tax credits shall not be allowed for calendar
year 2026 or any calendar year thereafter, except that any tax credits allowed
in calendar year 2025 that are unused may be carried forward as provided in
subsection (6) of section 77-3119.
Sec. 48. Section 77-3126, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
77-3126 (1) The total amount of tax credits allowed in any fiscal year
under the Cast and Crew Nebraska Act shall not exceed five hundred thousand
dollars in fiscal year 2025-26 and one million dollars in any fiscal year
thereafter.
(2) The maximum allowable tax credit claimed under the act in any single
taxable year for any qualified production activity that is a full-length film,
made-for-television movie, television series of at least five episodes, or
streaming television series shall not exceed five hundred thousand dollars in
fiscal year 2025-26 and one million dollars in any fiscal year thereafter.
Sec. 49. Section 77-3136, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
77-3136 (1) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2025, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, an
eligible taxpayer shall be allowed a credit against the income tax imposed by
the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 or any tax imposed by sections 77-907 to
77-918 or 77-3801 to 77-3807 for qualified shortline railroad maintenance
expenditures.
(2) The credit provided in this section shall be a nonrefundable tax
credit equal to fifty percent of the qualified shortline railroad maintenance
expenditures incurred during the taxable year by the eligible taxpayer. The
amount of the credit may not exceed an amount equal to one thousand five
hundred dollars multiplied by the number of miles of railroad track owned or
leased in the state by the eligible taxpayer at the end of the taxable year.
(3) The total amount of tax credits allowed in a fiscal year under the
Nebraska Shortline Rail Modernization Act shall not exceed five hundred
thousand dollars for fiscal year 2025-26 and one million dollars for any fiscal
year thereafter.
Sec. 50. Section 77-3169, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
77-3169 (1) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2024, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, a
taxpayer shall be eligible to receive a one-time credit against the income tax
imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 for the cost of installation of a
reverse osmosis system at the primary residence of the taxpayer if test results
for the following in the drinking water for such residence are above:
(a) Ten parts per million for nitrate nitrogen;
(b) Four parts per trillion for perfluorooctanoic acid or
perfluorooctanesulfonic acid;
(c) Thirty micrograms per liter or thirty parts per billion for uranium;
or
(d) One on the Hazard Index for perfluorononanoic acid,
perfluorohexanesulfonic acid, hexafluoropropylene oxide dimer acid and its
ammonium salt, or perfluorobutanesulfonic acid.
(2) Only one taxpayer per residence may be a recipient of the credit.
(3) The credit provided in this section shall be a refundable tax credit
equal to fifty percent of the cost incurred by the taxpayer during the taxable
year for installation of the reverse osmosis system, up to a maximum of one
thousand dollars.
(4) A taxpayer shall apply for the credit provided in this section by
submitting an application to the department with the following information:
(a) Documentation of the test results of the drinking water for the
taxpayer's primary residence;
(b) Documentation of the cost of the reverse osmosis system installed at
such residence; and
(c) Any other documentation required by the department.
(5) If the department determines that the taxpayer qualifies for the tax
credit under this section, the department shall approve the application and
certify the amount of the approved credit to the taxpayer.
(6) The department shall consider applications in the order in which they
are received and may approve tax credits under this section each fiscal year
until the aggregate limit allowed under subsection (7) of this section has been
reached.
(7) The department may approve tax credits for each fiscal year until the
total amount of credits approved reaches two hundred fifty thousand dollars for
fiscal years 2024-25 and 2025-26, five hundred thousand dollars for fiscal
years 2024-25, 2025-26, and 2026-27 and 2027-28, and one million dollars for
any fiscal year thereafter.
(8) A taxpayer shall claim any tax credits granted under this section by
attaching the tax credit certification received from the department under
subsection (5) of this section to the taxpayer's tax return.
-32-

LB650 LB650
2025 2025
Sec. 51. Section 77-3806, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
77-3806 (1) The tax return shall be filed and the total amount of the
franchise tax shall be due on the fifteenth day of the third month after the
end of the taxable year. No extension of time to pay the tax shall be granted.
If the Tax Commissioner determines that the amount of tax can be computed from
available information filed by the financial institutions with either state or
federal regulatory agencies, the Tax Commissioner may, by regulation, waive the
requirement for the financial institutions to file returns.
(2) Sections 77-2714 to 77-27,135 relating to deficiencies, penalties,
interest, the collection of delinquent amounts, and appeal procedures for the
tax imposed by section 77-2734.02 shall also apply to the tax imposed by
section 77-3802. If the filing of a return is waived by the Tax Commissioner,
the payment of the tax shall be considered the filing of a return for purposes
of sections 77-2714 to 77-27,135.
(3) No refund of the tax imposed by section 77-3802 shall be allowed
unless a claim for such refund is filed within ninety days of the date on which
(a) the tax is due or was paid, whichever is later, (b) a change is made to the
amount of deposits or the net financial income of the financial institution by
a state or federal regulatory agency, or (c) the Nebraska Investment Finance
Authority issues an eligibility statement to the financial institution pursuant
to the Affordable Housing Tax Credit Act.
(4) Any such financial institution shall receive a credit on the franchise
tax as provided under the Affordable Housing Tax Credit Act, the Community
Development Assistance Act, the Creating High Impact Economic Futures Act, the
Nebraska Higher Blend Tax Credit Act, the Nebraska Job Creation and Mainstreet
Revitalization Act, the Nebraska Property Tax Incentive Act, the Relocation
Incentive Act, the New Markets Job Growth Investment Act, the Sustainable
Aviation Fuel Tax Credit Act, and the Nebraska Shortline Rail Modernization
Act.
Sec. 52. Section 77-4602, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
77-4602 (1) Within fifteen days after the end of each month, the Tax
Commissioner shall provide a public statement of actual General Fund net
receipts, a comparison of such actual net receipts to the monthly estimated net
receipts from the most recent forecast provided by the Nebraska Economic
Forecasting Advisory Board pursuant to section 77-27,158, and a comparison of
such actual net receipts to the monthly actual net receipts for the same month
of the previous fiscal year.
(2) Within fifteen days after the end of each fiscal year, the public
statement shall also include (a) a summary of actual General Fund net receipts
and estimated General Fund net receipts for the fiscal year as certified
pursuant to sections 77-4601 and 77-4603 and (b) a comparison of the actual
General Fund net receipts for the fiscal year to the actual General Fund net
receipts for the previous fiscal year.
(3)(a) Within fifteen days after the end of each fiscal year, the Tax
Commissioner shall determine:
(i) Actual actual General Fund net receipts for the most recently
completed fiscal year minus estimated General Fund net receipts for such fiscal
year as certified pursuant to sections 77-4601 and 77-4603; and .
(ii) Actual General Fund net receipts for the most recently completed
fiscal year minus one hundred three percent of actual General Fund net receipts
for the prior fiscal year.
(b) If the amount calculated in subdivision (3)(a)(i) of this section is a
positive number and the amount calculated in subdivision (3)(a)(ii) of this
section is a negative number, the Tax Commissioner shall certify the amount
calculated in subdivision (3)(a)(i) of this section to the State Treasurer. The
State Treasurer shall transfer such certified amount to the Cash Reserve Fund.
(c) If the amounts calculated in subdivisions (3)(a)(i) and (3)(a)(ii) of
this section are both positive numbers and the amount calculated in subdivision
(3)(a)(i) of this section exceeds the amount calculated in subdivision (3)(a)
(ii) of this section, the Tax Commissioner shall certify the amounts calculated
in subdivisions (3)(a)(i) and (3)(a)(ii) of this section to the State
Treasurer. The State Treasurer shall transfer the difference between the two
certified numbers to the Cash Reserve Fund. The State Treasurer shall transfer
the amount certified for subdivision (3)(a)(ii) of this section to the School
District Property Tax Relief Credit Fund.
(d) If the amounts calculated in subdivisions (3)(a)(i) and (3)(a)(ii) of
this section are both positive numbers and the amount calculated in subdivision
(3)(a)(i) of this section is less than the amount calculated in subdivision (3)
(a)(ii) of this section, the Tax Commissioner shall certify the amount
calculated in subdivision (3)(a)(i) of this section to the State Treasurer. The
State Treasurer shall transfer such certified amount to the School District
Property Tax Relief Credit Fund.
(b) If actual General Fund net receipts for the most recently completed
fiscal year exceed estimated General Fund net receipts for such fiscal year,
the Tax Commissioner shall certify the excess amount to the State Treasurer.
The State Treasurer shall transfer the excess amount to the Cash Reserve Fund,
except as otherwise provided in subdivision (3)(c) of this section.
(c) If actual General Fund net receipts for the most recently completed
fiscal year exceed one hundred three percent of actual General Fund net
receipts for the previous fiscal year, the transfer described in subdivision
(3)(b) of this section shall be modified as follows:
-33-

LB650 LB650
2025 2025
(i) The amount transferred to the Cash Reserve Fund shall be reduced by
the excess amount calculated under subdivision (3)(c) of this section; and
(ii) Such excess amount shall be transferred to the School District
Property Tax Relief Credit Fund.
Sec. 53. Section 77-6605, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
77-6605 The director shall consider program certification applications
under section 77-6604 in the order in which they are received. The director may
accept program certification applications on a continuous basis or may
establish, by rule and regulation, an annual program certification application
deadline. The director may approve program certification applications for
eligible businesses for a total of up to three million dollars in tax credits
for calendar years 2022 and 2023 and up to six million dollars in tax credits
per calendar year for calendar years 2024 and 2025 beyond. The director shall
not approve any program certification applications for eligible businesses for
calendar years 2026 through 2029. For calendar year 2030 and each calendar year
thereafter, the director may approve program certification applications for
eligible businesses for a total of up to six million dollars in tax credits per
calendar year. Program certification applications approved after such annual
limit has been reached shall be placed on a wait list in the order in which
they are received.
Sec. 54. Section 77-6919, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
77-6919 (1) To earn the incentives set forth in the Urban Redevelopment
Act, the taxpayer shall file an application for an agreement with the Director
of Economic Development.
(2) The application shall:
(a) Identify the taxpayer applying for incentives;
(b) Identify the location or locations where the new investment and
employment will occur, including documentation to show that each such location
is a qualified location;
(c) State the estimated, projected amount of new investment and the
estimated, projected number of new equivalent employees; and
(d) Include an application fee of five hundred dollars. The fee shall be
remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Nebraska Incentives Fund.
(3) Subject to the limit in subsection (4) of this section, the director
shall approve the application and authorize the total amount of incentives
expected to be earned if he or she is satisfied that the qualified location or
locations meet the requirements established in section 77-6920 and such
requirements will be reached within the required time period.
(4) The director shall not approve further applications once the expected
incentives from the approved projects total eight million dollars. All but one
hundred dollars of the application fee shall be refunded to the applicant if
the application is not approved for any reason.
(5) Applications for incentives shall be considered in the order in which
they are received.
(6) The director has ninety days to approve a complete application.
(7) After approval, the taxpayer and the director shall enter into a
written agreement. As part of such agreement, the taxpayer shall agree to
increase the levels of employment and investment required by the act and the
director, on behalf of the State of Nebraska, shall, in consideration of the
taxpayer's agreement, agree to allow the taxpayer to use the incentives
contained in the Urban Redevelopment Act up to the total amount that were
authorized by the director at the time of approval. The application and all
supporting documentation, to the extent approved, shall be considered a part of
the agreement. The agreement shall state:
(a) The levels of employment and investment required by the act for the
project;
(b) The time period under the act in which the required levels must be
met;
(c) The documentation the taxpayer will need to supply when claiming an
incentive under the act;
(d) The date the application was filed; and
(e) The maximum amount of incentives authorized.
(8) The application, the agreement, all supporting information, and all
other information reported to the Director of Economic Development shall be
kept confidential by the director, except for the name of the taxpayer, the
location of the project, the estimated amounts of increased employment and
investment stated in the application, the date of the complete application, the
date the agreement was signed, and the information required to be reported by
section 77-6928. The application, the agreement, and all supporting information
shall be provided by the director to the Department of Revenue. The director
shall disclose, to any municipalities in which project locations exist, the
approval of an application and the execution of an agreement under this
section. The Tax Commissioner shall also notify each municipality of the amount
and taxpayer identity for each refund of local option sales and use taxes of
the municipality within thirty days after the refund is allowed or approved.
Disclosures shall be kept confidential by the municipality unless publicly
disclosed previously by the taxpayer or by the State of Nebraska.
(9) There shall be no new applications for incentives filed under this
section after the operative date of this section December 31, 2031.
Sec. 55. Section 77-7012, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
-34-

LB650 LB650
2025 2025
77-7012 (1) If the department determines that an application is complete
and that the taxpayer qualifies for tax credits, the department shall approve
the application within the limits set forth in this section and shall certify
the amount of tax credits approved to the taxpayer.
(2) The department may approve up to one million dollars in tax credits in
fiscal year 2024-25 and each up to one million five hundred thousand dollars in
tax credits in any fiscal year thereafter. If the total amount of tax credits
requested in any fiscal year exceeds such limit, the department shall allocate
the tax credits proportionally based upon amounts requested.
Sec. 56. Section 77-7304, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
77-7304 (1) The School District Property Tax Relief Credit Fund is
created. The fund shall only be used pursuant to the School District Property
Tax Relief Act. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be
invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
(2)(a) The State Treasurer shall transfer seven hundred fifty million
dollars from the General Fund to the School District Property Tax Relief Credit
Fund in fiscal year 2024-25, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by
the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of
Administrative Services.
(b) Beginning in fiscal year 2025-26, it is the intent of the Legislature
that an amount sufficient to provide the amount of property tax relief required
by subdivision (1)(a) of section 77-7305 for each tax year be transferred from
the General Fund to the School District Property Tax Relief Credit Fund.
(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that seven hundred eighty million
dollars be transferred from the General Fund to the School District Property
Tax Relief Credit Fund in fiscal year 2025-26.
(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that eight hundred eight million
dollars be transferred from the General Fund to the School District Property
Tax Relief Credit Fund in fiscal year 2026-27.
(d) It is the intent of the Legislature that eight hundred thirty-eight
million dollars be transferred from the General Fund to the School District
Property Tax Relief Credit Fund in fiscal year 2027-28.
(e) It is the intent of the Legislature that eight hundred seventy million
dollars be transferred from the General Fund to the School District Property
Tax Relief Credit Fund in fiscal year 2028-29.
(f) It is the intent of the Legislature that nine hundred two million
dollars be transferred from the General Fund to the School District Property
Tax Relief Credit Fund in fiscal year 2029-30.
(g) It is the intent of the Legislature that the amount transferred from
the General Fund to the School District Property Tax Relief Credit Fund in
fiscal year 2030-31 and each fiscal year thereafter be equal to the total
amount transferred in the preceding fiscal year increased by three percent.
Sec. 57. Section 77-7305, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
77-7305 (1) The School District Property Tax Relief Act shall apply to tax
year 2024 and each tax year thereafter. The property tax relief shall be in the
form of property tax credits which appear on property tax statements. Property
tax credits granted under the act shall be credited against the amount of
property taxes owed to school districts. The total amount of property tax
relief granted under the act shall be determined as follows:
(a) For tax year 2024, the minimum total amount of relief granted under
the act shall be seven hundred fifty million dollars. For tax year 2025, the
minimum total amount of relief granted under the act shall be seven hundred
eighty million dollars. For tax year 2026, the minimum total amount of relief
granted under the act shall be eight hundred eight million dollars. For tax
year 2027, the minimum total amount of relief granted under the act shall be
eight hundred thirty-eight million dollars. For tax year 2028, the minimum
total amount of relief granted under the act shall be eight hundred seventy
million dollars. For tax year 2029, the minimum total amount of relief granted
under the act shall be nine hundred two million dollars. For tax year 2030 and
each tax year thereafter, the minimum total amount of relief granted under the
act shall be the minimum total amount of relief from the prior year, excluding
any additional relief provided pursuant to subdivision (1)(b) of this section,
with such amount then increased by three percent; and .
(b) If money is transferred to the School District Property Tax Relief
Credit Fund pursuant to section 77-4602, such amount shall be added to the
minimum amount required under subdivision (1)(a) of this section when
determining the total amount of relief granted under the act for the tax year
in which the transfer occurs. If no such transfer occurs in a given tax year,
the minimum amount required under subdivision (1)(a) of this section shall be
the total amount of relief granted under the act for such tax year. The relief
shall be in the form of property tax credits which appear on property tax
statements. Property tax credits granted under the act shall be credited
against the amount of property taxes owed to school districts.
(2) To determine the amount of the property tax credit for each parcel,
the county treasurer shall multiply the amount disbursed to the county under
subsection (4) of this section by the ratio of the school district taxes levied
in the prior year on the parcel to the school district taxes levied in the
prior year on all real property in the county. The amount so determined shall
be the property tax credit for that parcel.
(3) If the real property owner qualifies for a homestead exemption under
-35-

LB650 LB650
2025 2025
sections 77-3501 to 77-3529, the owner shall also be qualified for the property
tax credit provided in this section to the extent of any remaining liability
after calculation of the homestead exemption. If the property tax credit
provided in this section results in a property tax liability on the homestead
that is less than zero, the amount of the credit which cannot be used by the
taxpayer shall be returned to the Property Tax Administrator by July 1 of the
year the amount disbursed to the county was disbursed. The Property Tax
Administrator shall immediately credit any funds returned under this subsection
to the School District Property Tax Relief Credit Fund. Upon the return of any
funds under this subsection, the county treasurer shall electronically file a
report with the Property Tax Administrator, on a form prescribed by the Tax
Commissioner, indicating the amount of funds distributed to each school
district in the county in the year the funds were returned and the amount of
unused credits returned.
(4) The amount disbursed to each county under this section shall be equal
to the amount available for disbursement under subsection (1) of this section
multiplied by the ratio of the school district taxes levied in the prior year
on all real property in the county to the school district taxes levied in the
prior year on all real property in the state. By September 15, 2024, and by
September 15 of each year thereafter, the Property Tax Administrator shall
determine the amount to be disbursed under this subsection to each county and
shall certify such amounts to the State Treasurer and to each county. The
disbursements to the counties shall occur in two equal payments, the first on
or before January 31 and the second on or before April 1.
(5) The county treasurer shall disburse amounts received under subsection
(4) of this section, which are credited against the amount of property taxes
owed to school districts, in the same manner as if such funds had been received
in the form of property tax payments for property taxes owed to school
districts, meaning any amounts attributable to divided taxes pursuant to
section 18-2147 of the Community Development Law shall be remitted to the
applicable authority for which such taxes were divided.
(6) The School District Property Tax Relief Credit Fund shall be used for
purposes of making the disbursements to counties required under subsection (4)
of this section.
Sec. 58. Section 81-1201.12, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-1201.12 The department shall:
(1) Submit and adopt all necessary plans, enter into contracts, and accept
gifts, grants, and federal funds; and
(2) Administer the tax credit programs program established by the Creating
High Impact Economic Futures Act and the Community Development Assistance Act
and adopt and promulgate rules and regulations pursuant to such acts act.
Sec. 59. Sections 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, 8, 10, 11, 12, 13, 36, 37, 39, 41,
42, 51, 58, and 62 of this act become operative on January 1, 2026. Sections 40
and 61 of this act become operative three calendar months after the adjournment
of this legislative session. The other sections of this act become operative on
their effective date.
Sec. 60. Original sections 18-3417, 77-1804, 77-1806, 77-1815, 77-1816,
77-1819, 77-1823, 77-1825, 77-1829, 77-1836, 77-1856, 77-1902, and 77-1909,
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, and sections 77-1632, 77-1633, 77-1802,
77-1807, 77-1818, 77-1831, 77-1832, 77-1833, 77-1837, 77-1838, 77-2706.02,
77-27,187.02, 77-27,188, 77-27,241, 77-3110, 77-3120, 77-3126, 77-3136,
77-3169, 77-4602, 77-6605, 77-6919, 77-7012, 77-7304, and 77-7305, Revised
Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
Sec. 61. Original section 77-2711, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
Sec. 62. Original sections 60-3,185, 77-202.23, 77-202.24, and
81-1201.12, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, and sections 77-908,
77-2701.16, 77-2703, 77-2708, 77-2715.07, 77-2734.03, and 77-3806, Revised
Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
Sec. 63. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when passed and
approved according to law.
-36-